You could take this as confirmation of the broadcasters' good judgement, but the danger is that it was a self-fulfilling prophecy. Had Siobhan Benita, for instance, been granted equal airtime with the big four it is quite possible that she would have finished third. And the sort of people who work for the BBC are likely to feel warmer about the Greens than they do about UKIP, whatever the parties' objective prospects in a particular contest.
I’m not quite sure what this is going to look like.
And really, it was only a ‘sort of’ argument.
The flowers are made with the Daisies #2 die, using 2 of the medium daisies layered together and then I sponged the edges with Cherry Cobbler ink. The flower center is made with the the Floral Fusion Sizzlit Die--2 large and 1 medium sponged with Cherry Cobbler on the edges and offset. The Cherry Cobbler center is punched from the Boho Blossoms punch, wrapped with the new Cherry Cobbler baker's twine from the 2011 Summer Mini Catalog (see side bar).
“No comment”
Those additional sums could help the city and state housing agencies fulfill more of the pending requests, but not, apparently, all of them.
Refusing to go quietly in the night, members of the PCN and PDC hope to prolong their political lives under new logos, colors and, of course, new acronyms. The right-wing PCN has already recast itself as the Concertación Nacional (CN) while the PDC has spun off into the Partido de la Esperanza (PES).
So go ahead and join! I sure will.
– Big Country Southwest: Rice, North Texas, UT-San Antonio, Tulane, Louisiana Tech, Southern Mississippi
Athanasius
So here is the obligatory pic
Catelynn: "How am I being rude??"
2.) The tense changes from Ettin to Eaten.
***Thanks to Caren Feldman of the Toronto Film Society for screening this film. It’s a rare one, and even finding images of it online is difficult. As you probably guessed, the picture at top is not an authentic still.
How in the hell are we more bothered by tits now than in 1936? We are less sophisticated than we were in 1936! Think about that! No, don't, it'll make your head hurt.
Billy Cobham – Spectrum
Well, I guess I'll have to be a little more careful of what appears to be original that is in fact recycled from past posts. Not like I keep a list of what I've put on here before, you know....
He seems to be doing just fine. Lots of bubbles and activity for sure! See:
The fine tradition of committing crimes in style while residing in a grand British manor continues in Simon Brett’s Blotto, Twinks, and the Ex-King’s Daughter. When playing host to an exiled king and his entourage, the aristocratic family of Tawcester Towers become embroiled in foreign politics, and of course, murder. Both are highly inconvenient, but with his brilliant sister Twinks at his side, Blotto is good-natured enough to investigate. Through kidnappings, traitors, and a lack of cricket playing, the aristocratic siblings work their way through the twists and dangers of the plot.
It would not do to be reminded
He ran, ran as he hadn't run in years. Broad sticks splintered beneath his heavy boots, driven deep into gritty soil. Branches whipped his face, scrub scraped at his calves above his boots, raising welts that remained all but invisible against skin red enough to suggest an agonizing sunburn. Or at least it would have, had he been human.
I left with a lovely wild caught yellowfin tuna steak, some fresh asparagus, a red onion, grape tomatoes, a ginger/scallion marinade for the fish, shitake risotto, lemon goat cheese, a bottle of really nice Savignon Blanc and a slice of key lime pie.
Kerri came home upset because an older boy called her a "Chinese little bum" at school. The teachers could not do anything about it because it happened at recess, and Kerri could not identify the boy. She only knew he was a sixth grader, but did not know his name and could not point him out (he apparently went inside). I think there are only two Chinese girls in the entire school, so we are pretty sure it was directed at her.
That is an ironclad concept that only runs afoul of citizenship conferred at birth and the awful ruling from the SCOTUS on Roe v. Wade on the right to privacy issue AND the viability issue.
Samsung has also made its 2,100mAh battery removable, and the handset will come in three storage capacities: 16GB, 32GB, and 64GB (this latter size won’t be immediately available.) In addition, it has a microSD card slot for up to another 64GB of storage. The handset will have 1GB RAM for running applications.
EXHALE (book 2) is scheduled for release on June 5, and JUST BREATHE, the final book in the trilogy, comes out July 10. That’s assuming I can finish it by then. HA!
But if you were to go for boring authenticity, probably James Bolam in his younger days as we both come from the same town and went to the same school and kind of walk and talk in the same fashion, although he is a little broader in his accent.
One of my early posts ‘Hip Hip Hooray’ about (you guessed it) my hips became part of a gorgeous coffee table book ‘Amongst Sisters’ by Amanda Foxon-Smith. I met Amanda on-line and loved her ideas about celebrating the beauty of women – even if we don’t all comply with the world’s idea of beauty. This book introduced me to the world of book launches and I doubt any future launches will match the amazing party at Marrickville, complete with pole dancers, hoola hoop artists plus an insightful interview by Lisa Wilkinson. If ever I mention a book launch now my husband and his mates light up and ask eagerly ‘Will there be dancing girls?’.
The major settlement, Vaitape is on the western side of the main island, opposite the main channel into the lagoon. Produce of the island is mostly limited to what can be obtained from the sea and the plentiful coconut trees, which were historically of economic importance for copra. According to a census performed in 2008, the permanent population of Bora Bora is 8,880.
I live relatively close to Philadelphia, New York City, and Washington, DC...and I'm really close to the beach!! I love the East Coast:).
DSK’s team has made one observation, however, with which any objective legal mind would have to agree. This relates to the ‘wide array of prejudicial information about Mr. Strauss-Kahn, including information which even if true, would never be admissible in any court’. This is right on the money, and doing it puts Cyrus Vance’s department clearly offside.
7) Once a parent told me that I would have more friends if I was less opinionated.
Caulking and Liquid Nails - I went through a couple tubes of each - maybe $10?
5-6 tablespoon ice cold water
Defense lawyers had argued at his trial that Cobb suffered abuse as a child and from fetal alcohol syndrome, the result of his mother drinking liquor while she was pregnant with him. Prosecutors presented witnesses who testified Cobb was able to tell the difference between right and wrong.
Smalls: Yeah, well I don’t want to hear anything from the Peanut Butter Jelly Gallery!
Want to play along? All that’s necessary to participate is to describe your life (or something) in a phrase using just six words.
Take all the babies to the room with no smoke,
-Brooks recommends that we start with the end in mind, and work incrementally rather than wholesale.
"Do you want to come with us to Jurassic Park?" Asked Amber, my oldest granddaughter.
But “the addiction runs you,” she said. Her daughter — who had been honest almost to a fault when she was younger — was suddenly lying and telling tales to get to her drugs.
An 87-year-old friend phoned me to help with her toilet. Yes. I said toilet. It was plugged. I went. Toilet fixed and she cracked some champagne for us because we haven’t seen one another since before Christmas.
"If you have men who will exclude any of God's creatures from the shelter of compassion and pity, you will have men who will deal likewise with their fellow men."
To not give up
Bornhöft G, Wolf U, von Ammon K, Righetti M, Maxion-Bergemann S, Baumgartner S, Thurneysen AE, Matthiessen PF. Effectiveness, safety and cost-effectiveness of homeopathy in general practice – summarized health technology assessment. Forschende Komplementärmedizin (2006);13 Suppl 2:19-29. http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/16883077
He said, "Get dressed, don't wake the kids, grab the tractor, don't worry about the loader bucket, it has the blade on the back, and come plow me out."
Strength training can also help lower the risk of osteoporosis, heart disease, diabetes, sleep apnea, arthritis, and several other degenerative conditions.
So here it is in a nutshell I think in all I will end up spending around $350.00 total for both children for the year. I have not added in the cost of the extra classes yet but if we take the sports and dance at the recreation center that gets things down a bit in price because we are residence. And that is also something I have asked the grandparents if they could pitch in on this years extracurriculars. Hopefully something comes through on that end. If not we can always get by on walking the trails at our parks and doing exercise OnDemand cable.
KYLE CHANDLER / Eric Taylor – “FRIDAY NIGHT LIGHTS” (DirecTV)
And reconfirm your international payment voucher number and your reference identification number respectively before that office with a view to the final remittance approval and subsequent crediting of your bank account to the tune of funds as stated herein.
Go with the flow.
Head Circ: 18.5 inches (26.44%)
the first challenge of each month will be a Guest Designer search!
She and my Grandfather both lived to celebrate their 50th wedding anniversary, surrounded by family and friends, the result of a lifetime together. When he died, she quietly dispensed of all his personal belongings, saving only his black haircomb, his razor and his shaving foam brush as keepsakes – the items she knew he had used and touched every day. We found these tucked away in a box, after she too had passed, and my heart ached for her…
your eyes, your mouth
22. Vinear's X-Out Session/Death/Life (dialogue) (02:51)
that these waters were once just snow
Pub Date: October 4, 2011
Cardstock: GinaK Designs
The Palacio da Cidade in Rio: Complete with beautiful palm trees, marble stairs, and lots of conference delegates behind those pearly white walls.
Yet another unnamed victim in all this will be trust. Trust gets a kicking in Ukraine on a daily basis. It simply no longer exists in any meaningful way between the political class (of any party) and society. It maybe that the EU policy of engagement with Ukrainian civil society and not the political classes will prove to be a very smart policy move indeed.
When (if!) you listen to the President, keep in mind that at some point the money he’s talking about is no longer even “real.”
But I'm a fan of what's been going over at the Creative Circle lately. They've done that most simple but rare thing - specialised. In British Work. It's a bold move and I applaud it, not because I have a problem with work from overseas (in fact I find the best of US advertising puts British advertising to shame) but because it seems like all of the others are just interested in selling more and more entries, annuals and seats at the slap-up back-slap awards dinners. But the Creative circle now feels like it stands for something.
Boy are you one heck of a wild man these days! Literally bouncing off the walls. Every time I turn around your jumping and kicking walls, or falling down and hurting yourself, or knocking something over or just plain making a mess. I hate that every 10 minutes I’m having to tell you to calm down, or to stop, or to be quiet because everything you do comes with awesome sound effects!
Ok, back to the review. So Rose is being trained by Dimitri, a lot, and there is a lot of sexual tension between these two. And although nothing really happens between them, they spark, and how! But they both know nothing can happen, but Rose’s point of view is really funny. Seeing her go all mushy on Dimitri.
“Who says I am?”
5. Don’t get cute. You might really love butterflies. They’re iconic to you. You might enjoy the aesthetics of lighthouses, or the calm the comes over you when you see puppies. I don’t care. If I see a puppy, I will rightfully assume your book is about puppies. And if you write mysteries about a P.I., you’re giving me the wrong idea. If you write erotic romance and you have a huge lighthouse in the middle of your business card, I’ll think it’s phallic humor. Is this a joke to you?
Children move, sing, dance, chant, cheer …and then read, their hearts on fire, their eyes bright, their dreams unleashed. CDF Freedom Schools Program has schools all over the country, and is constantly opening more,promoting, increasing literacy in children who might otherwise slip through the cracks.
The print of a scarecrow in a brown coat
Two and a half productive hours in the sunshine. The only thing missing was the camera. Sorry.
she is a window, a door,
The greatest of life’s joys
and I’ll come to you my love
Parties and company events can be handled also..
Live simply, love generously, care deeply, speak kindly and have peace with god.
I know how to plan. When I'm very successful at weight loss, running, crossing stuff off my to-do list when I have plan.
Instead, or until I find my pattern for my favorite new thing to share, I'm going to share with you a host of Valentiene's Day links. I've shared all of them on my Facebook page but, compiling them into one list is always easier. Don't you think? ; )
-Your tea is getting cold dear...I made it extra sweet for you...four lumps of sugar...as you like it..
Of course, it rained. Quite a lot, as it happened - mostly on the morning we were trying to pack the tent up; a task which took on an interesting 'It's a Knockout' aspect with the addition of gallons of water pouring over the whole proceedings. But in between downpours it was almost freakishly hot and sunny. Well, for Derbyshire anyway, which, happily, is a county generously endowed with pubs in which to dry off. We shopped for new term supplies in beautiful Buxton, and sampled water from the famous spring. It was warm...
Did you know that it is only $10 to sign up to become an AVON rep? You will get books and samples to get you started, plus a free website to sell to customers online. You can sign up online, www.start.youravon.com/. If you want, you can use my code tlessick, and join my team. I will be happy to help you build your business.
At Lakemba Mosque earlier, a media crew had been involved in an altercation with some in the crowd about 7pm. A man is believed to have suffered a broken leg during a scuffle.
our family Easter day.
Page yourself over the intercom (do NOT disguise your voice).
In this short, we meet the original Sean and Jem (circa 1800′s). If you read Darkness and Light, you understand what that means.
backyard. That was what killed the baby.
the wristband from Lauren's show
Over the paper doll
Jenny, I love you with all of my heart and every fiber of my soul. Every breath I take is for you, and every beat of my heart reminds me that you are the reason I live. From the moment we met, your eyes told me everything I needed to know, and since that day we have laughed together, cried together, and shared together every part of ourselves. You know the deepest depths of my soul, and I know the deepest depths of yours, and today our two souls are joined forever as one.
1 type
Mayor Curtis Carlos Campton was a divorced man. Rita Rowena, his wife of twenty-one years, left him because of undisclosed circumstances. He had been mayor for over thirteen years. At the time, there was no term limits for the mayor of Poverty, and people seem to love Mayor Campton. After Curtis and Rita were divorced. People began to wonder why Curtis never started dating again. Folks talked about the Mayor’s new habit of volunteering his time with the boy scouts and allowing his home to be over run with foreign exchange students. The mayor was a respected member of the community, until people started asking questions. “Why does the Mayor always have a young boy with him?” and “There’s another young man coming from India to stay with the Mayor this school year.” These questions led to more questions, and the community began to wonder if Mayor Campton was as good a man as everyone thought. It isn’t natural for a grown man to spend all his time with young boys. There was a cause for concern. It wasn’t long after the talk started that F.B.I. started an investigation. Shortly after Mayor Campton realized that he was under investigation. he became an absentee Mayor. who resigned quickly and disappeared. It’s all in the name of good politics and strange bed fellows.
Well fast forward 3o years and what do you have? A 40+ year old journalist, who ran his tweet through the 12-year-old Roland filter, instead of his current mind that should have taken into account what was at stake. His career.
Do you have a dream that you have cherished in the depths of your being, forever? Big or small, doesn’t matter. Do not trivialize it as just a pipe dream. Go after it!
What a total honour to get to sing with you guys and hear your AMAZING harmonies on my songs. It made me feel really lucky.
What do women value in men?
Anyways, back to my martial arts class. It’s Taekwondo, not just general martial arts. I really love it, and I’m a second degree black belt! Wowzahs! I can’t believe it. But anyone can do it, if they keep at it. At least, that’s my opinion. I really enjoy teaching people Taekwondo, (I teach a lot of people because I’m a black belt) and I think I’m good at it too. Going to Taekwondo is therapeutic for me. I guess it’s what people call their “me” time? Who knows. Most people would find a bunch of screaming kids running around like nutcases irritating, and stressful, but for some reason, it makes me really happy. I guess for those days that you feel so overwhelmed by life, the simplicity of kids is refreshing.
“The end of the Cold War, the advance of globalisation and the increasing influence of China and India as emerging political and economic power houses have forced Asean to shift from its original preventive diplomacy of maintaining peace and harmony to the constructive diplomacy of community building.
International Bitterness Units: 101
Life can be scary, life can be daunting. Yet look below, there is Jesus.
It's been quite a week!
If you don't want your child to do or see something, fucking stop them. They're probably shorter than you, and certainly a lot less fit. Unless you take them on their X-Box, you'll probably get the upper hand.
2 oz. sliced pepperoni (28-ish), cut in fourths
I had dinner with Pete and his nephew last night and the topic of religion came up. Pete's nephew was presenting a paper at SUNY Stonybrook this week on the intertwining of Catholicism and Mayan culture. The conversation around this fascinated me. It was about the origins of faith, the parallels in every culture on this planet, and how at times the western variety religious teaching could be pretty insular.
Of course, if items like these happen to you, so what can you typically do? Where will you typically change for support? will you request your relatives and would they be able to offer the actual particular total which you will want, from the soonest possible time, very? The tough truth of the matter is that the recession has just about remaining everybody cracked, if you decide to will call at your friends, would you have the allow you to will need? In addition to the possible knock back, you will also be limited for the fantastic humiliation.
“Security researchers from Trusteer have spotted a clever new technique used by cybercriminals interested in optimizing their malicious campaigns in an attempt to earn more revenue.” Read more..
My favorite passage from Dead Flesh:
Of course I worked this challenge close to my new digi release. I have been so looking forward to using these digis. I am not an Alice superfan or anything.... but there is just something about the fun and mystery of it all that draws me in. I can do all kinds of weird and fun things to my cards that I might not do otherwise because it IS Alice in Wonderland!
But this morning, I found this verse in the Message translation, and the wording of it spoke to my heart.
West End Rocker
Opener Dick Around metamorphoses from chamber pop into a galloping heavy rock tune with crunchy guitars - although that's about the extent of the divergence from the chamber pop theme. That bastion of good taste, the BBC, found it necessary to protect the great unwashed masses by banning the Dick Around single. Imagine the carnage that may have occurred if the song was broadcast during peak hour traffic!
Use water-retaining gel in containers and hanging baskets. Mulching pots with a layer of horticultural grit or other stones such as slate chippings also helps to keep the compost moist. It also looks more attractive than bare soil, And where practical, use larger pots as they heat up less quickly and don’t dry out as quickly as small ones do. Think also about planting drought tolerant plants rather than thirsty bedding plants.
I’m plastic
3. Kurt Angle vs. Anarchia.
So that's a little look into how we try to make our house a home. To me, it's all about surrounding yourself with beautiful things that hold meaning. If you do that, you really can't go wrong.
This session assumes that you already have a User Form that you wish to add captcha capability to.
6:00 PM Amanda Lew Kee
Sei Shonagon lived a thousand years ago and was one of the Ladies who attended on the Empress of that time. She wrote little descriptions – moments in time, memos, instructions, criticisms and so on. These were much admired for the sharpness of her pen and sometime after her death they were collected together in a volume called The Pillow Book of Sei Shonagon. I haven’t read it in twenty or more years. I went on Amazon (as one does) and saw that I good get a copy of the Penguin classics edition (the one I was familiar with) in used condition for £0.01p – now in terms of pure value that is fantastic. Of course, in order to get it in my grubby hands I need to pay £2.80 – which puts this book at the top end of what I like to pay for a book (I know! The paradoxical conundrum of a writer who expects people to fork out good money to buy a brand new copy of his latest work but begrudges to do the same for other writers. Well, the truth is, I do buy new books too – it’s just I love the treasure troves of books of yore that one finds in the discount racks. The Surrealists, I think it was, prized what they called objets trouve – things found accidentally. The accidental (or would it be incidental) conjunction of significance between a mind and an object. The ‘Yes!’ moment, that in other circumstances is love-at-first-sight. What I prize are the livres trouve – the found books.)
3 potatoes cubed in small cubes (bite sized)
Not sure we should actually be cheering.
Maurice Vincent Barry, 49, Rutherford, N.J.
O Lord, wilt thou not shut the gates of thy righteousness before me, that I may walk in the path of the low valley, that I may be strict in the plain road!…Wilt thou encircle me around in the robe of thy righteousness! Wilt thou make my path straight before me!
I used Nancy Silverton’s recipe that appeared in Bon Appetit. The recipe made just enough ( 1 cup) to use in the ricotta gnocchi my family had for dinner Sunday night. The gnocchi recipe comes from Michael Symon in his book “Michael Symon’s Live to Cook.” Making homemade ricotta is more waiting than cooking. You heat the cream, milk, lemon juice and salt just until boiling, them remove from the heat and let the curds separate from the whey. Have some cheesecloth on hand to line a sieve placed inside a large bowl and pour the mixture into the bowl, trying to keep whatever curds have formed intact.
Denis Charles - drums
I will rejoice in my TAGS (talents, abilities, gifts, and skills) from God with thanksgiving in my heart♥
You can obtain English machine-translations for Japanese patent and utility model documents from 1993 onwards on the Japan Patent Office's free-of-charge "IPDL" (Industrial Property Digital Library) internet service at http://www.ipdl.inpit.go.jp/homepg_e.ipdl.
The religion of the Boers is one of their greatest characteristics, and one that can hardly be understood when it is taken into consideration that they have been separated for almost two hundred years from the refining influences of a higher civilization. The simple faith in a Supreme Being, which the original emigrants from Europe carried to South Africa, has been handed down from one generation to another, and in two centuries of fighting, trekking, and ranching has lost none of its pristine depth and fervour.
If you are like most sales people, you no doubt have many different types of industries that you currently sell. You could be selling to manufacturing, health care accounts, and educational institutions within your markets. Let’s take a minute and think about your different customers and what they might be trying to do to increase their own revenues. A manufacturing operation must produce more widgets or sell their current widget line to brand new customers. Another option is to create a new type of widget to sell to all their customers or to sell to a totally new widget market. With this idea of new widgets, if they were to continue to sell their current widgets to their current customers, the net effect will be to increase their revenue.
Wowie. What a challenge, eh?
Another Godard film on the big screen, another revelation!
So, basicaly I think it's time to start an anti-pillow-zipper movement. Who's with me? If you or someone you know has been injured by a lousy zipper in the heat of a pillow fight, please join me in this fight. Together we can make the world a better and brighter place for our children (and those of us that plan to continue to engage in pillow fights well into our autumn years).
Maybe it’s just me, but probably the best thing, (which also could be its worst) regarding iOS is it’s simplistic user experience. This has proven to be Apple’s ‘ace in the hole’ with all types of users, young and old alike. The fact that the overall appearance of iOS hasn’t changed is the reason that new users are successful in using it. Apple’s native system built apps are closely identical to all previous software versions and users are able to update their OS for ‘enhancements’ without having to relearn how to use it. This has been a win for the “basic” users of iOS. But, what about the advanced users like myself?
Begrudgingly a fan,
"No, that's not what I'm talking about. I'm so sad because you always fix everything for me and make everything okay and I want to do something really, really super for Mother's Day and I don't know what to do."
It Conquered the World - Josh T.
BUT WAIT... There is MORE! If I reach 300 followers by the end of the blog hop, I will be giving away an Assortment Pack from Peachy Keen Stamps! To be specific the PK-640 Princess Face Assortment!
“Foreign investors have faith in him,” says Ash, “Right now investors wouldn’t be too perturbed if he decided to change things.” So that’s alright then.
And he placed Dream
13. My mother taught me: THE CIRCLE OF LIFE.
I just discovered a great body of work by Artiva Design, an Italian creative studio. Much of their work is monochromatic, and uses line, space, and type as image quite effectively to create motion and energy out of just ink and paper. They make really beautiful print work. Definitely something to aspire to.
In the words of Paul, “For Christ sent me to preach the gospel — not with human wisdom, lest the cross of Christ be emptied of its power.” – 1 Corinthians 1:17
A trousseau is a wardrobe for a newly married woman. Literally clothes and accessories, so if mom is buying you definitely want one. While the tradition of a trousseau has become outdated, some women have turned the trousseau into their honeymoon wardrobe or lingerie specifically.
So when the Pulp Cover painter thinks about picking which moment to illustrate, he seems to be asking himself, "what's the most exciting moment in the whole book I can pick to show on the cover?" I imagine this is what sells books; those books are all about action so a potential buyer probably looks at all the covers and picks the one that looks like it has the most exciting story inside. So I think of this way of working as the "Pulp Cover" or "Comic Book" approach to picking the moment you use as the basis for your illustration, and it seems to be all about getting as much action as you can into one image and putting the viewer right in the middle of the violence.
Alternating Inverted Rows and Perfect Push Ups (Focus on using your back to pull you to the ground…Do not just simply drop into the Push Up! Same principle applies for the Rows.)
When I joined Waterstone's, over 20 years ago, I was told that one of my jobs would involve buying new titles from publishers. Surprisingly, there was no training, but in spite of this I was given a monthly budget of £5000 to spend in any way I pleased. Unsurprisingly, when the word got out that Waterstone's had delegated its new title buying to a load of chinless wonders, it was like a feeding frenzy.
Thomas Brunt is a sports-columnist/blogger follow his personal twitter feed here @BHS_SPORTSGUY, email him here: thesportsguy.brunt2@gmail.com
This IPA pours a gorgeous clear bright golden orange color with a good sized bone-white head on it that left spotting lacing on my glass. The nose on this beer is very unique and interesting for an IPA. I think mango is the strongest scent followed by passion fruit, peaches, lemon and orange zest, floral hops, and a slight pine bitterness as well. The smell on this beer is leaping from my glass, and it never left for the entire beer. The flavor profile is loaded with citrus fruits with grapefruit and tangerines being very dominant followed up with only a slight touch of caramel malt. The hops are extremely fresh and vibrant on this offering. The malt is only barely noticeable, but somehow supports the hops beautifully. The mouthfeel is medium bodied with medium carbonation that left a very dry finish on the back of my palate. The drinkability is superb on this beer, and is one of the best IPAs I've have ever had the pleasure of tasting.
I recently encountered a local church that has as a requirement of membership that you attend church twice on Sundays. By joining you agreed to that. No exceptions. And in the organisation all pastors have to offer two services every week. All churches have minimum expectations for members like this – and the basic one is Baptism which should come with a public profession of faith. And with this comes certain responsibilities and privileges.
Hi all!
From top left - The cherry tree with the sun setting behind it / Crochet jar cover / January sunshine @ Southwold/ Cake / Little birthday boy / more cake / Freedom at last as my bike & I were reunited / frost covered leaves / the frost patterns on the outside of the conservatory window.
Conversation with my Mom
I remember you all coming in and the mass the day she was buried. The harp and the bag pipes, the songs - "Gentle Woman," the greens filled with holy water that was held in her crystal bowl showering all of us with her blessing.
Creative Craft Challenges Blog
I want more of the satisfaction of finishing a project rather than the quick thrill of starting new ones. I want my thoughts to be clearer. I want to feel more organised. I would like to be able give my full attention to whatever it is I'm doing - which I know is not always possible, but I have this creeping feeling that there's a fine line between multi-tasking and information overload.
rd: Every single artist on the poll got at least one vote, resulting in a four way tie for sixth place. No one gets eliminated! (Or perhaps they all do??) I’m actually most surprised that Nell didn’t secure first place since they were perhaps the most popular of the suggestions and the panelists’ picks, but sometimes the voting audience doesn’t feel the same and Nell might have just had a weaker night.
And back in 1885, the company created the version of the Great Seal of the United States that still graces the back of every U.S. dollar bill.
As for the "LOVE" front....still contemplating....thanks to those who've dropped by and given an encouraging word.
The raw brew looks, smells and tastes just like a Pale Ale - without the carbonation. A lovely citrus kick and a better than expected hop aroma leads me to hope that the finished, matured brew will be a winner.
I colored him with copics and paper pieced the blanket with EP "times and seasons" dp. I just love the colors on that pad. DH walked in my room and asked the question "too much catnip"? and there you go. Didn't have to look far cuz I love the catered crop blog and the dts' creations for challenges so for FTR 25 I give you sick cat! Recipe FTR 25: papers= kraft, colors= kraft, black, cream, red and green, tools= emb folder=dots, die cuts= square, scallop edges, techniques= layers and dry emb. TFL and dont eat too much next week or you may end up like this "sick kitty"! lol I hope you have a great weekend!
I might actually attempt to use that random picker thingy this time cos it might be easier than writing all the entries down and then getting Nicholas to pick one out of a bowl. Entries close on Tuesday 9th February around 6pm (Australian time), so post your comment(s) by Monday 8th February evening, cos' you're probably behind me timewise.
But only children, the extremely intelligent and the celibate will notice that the taxi is being driven by a dog.
Here’s a breakdown of what the report suggests may have happened on the scene:
And, of course, those tribes with animistic tendencies tend to be indigenous, or at least not on the top of the social pyramid, and have to endure some unpleasant conditions because of this.
･IS03
Dr Judy Mikovits of the Whittemore Peterson Institute in Nevada and colleagues at the National Cancer Institute and the Cleveland Clinic emphasise that the finding only shows a link between the virus and chronic fatigue syndrome, or CFS, and does not prove that the pathogen causes the disorder.
Years ago, when Bow was three books jumbled all into one, I did make the rounds and kept at it until I had been rejected by every single English-speaking agent in the known world who handled historical fiction. I’m nothing if not a glutton for self-punishment. Truth to tell, they were right – the book was a mess.
One skipper and one inexperienced crew wasn’t enough to handle the 40 foot sloop. I knew a Japanese woman who was a diver and also keen to learn to sail so suggested her as crew.
1) Don't complain that the one dish you ordered didn't fill you up after the waiter recommended you should order at least two or three per person.
There is a lot of messiness involved with feeding a toddler.
As about myself I admit I’m Christian orthodox, but right now I’m far from being on the path towards evolution… so far, far away… lost between lack of courage and temptations of life, I just pray you are on the right path…
In other election news, Newt's minions have run the worst campaign I've seen in 20 years of closely following Florida elections. Topped by Robo-Calls to Senior Citizens ranting about a George Soros quote taken out-of-context. One in which Doctor Evil is heard saying "There won't be much of a difference between Romney and Obama" to an audience of euro-trash. It's dumb because Seniors:
It seemed appropriate to go for a rattle along the Pennine Bridleway. This runs near to my home and features a variety of terrain. While there’d be plenty of mud and snow following last week’s near blizzard conditions, rock-strewn tracks, filling-rattling cobbles and rotor-deep puddles would be the order of the day.
(Ignore the heart shaped pan, my pie tins were obviously dirty at the time I made this)
Renato Corona III and Antonio Carpio IV neck-and-neck in voting
I walked down toward the stream from where I’d been taking the previous couple of shots in order to spend some time with these two friendly pigs. You can’t tell from the photo but the ground is muddy and marshy here and the tethered pair were using their snouts to dig down into it for grubs and roots, at least that’s what they were doing until I came along to demand their attention.
So what do you think? Is appointing a foreign manager as a national coach a form of cheating? Or is it because English managers are not of the quality required to manage their country or secure other high-profile jobs? Leave a comment and let us know your views.
Last year a well known homeless man in Edmond, nicknamed “Bicycle Bob” as he was often seen riding a bicycle, was brutally stabbed to death. The random act of violence included cutting off one of the victim’s fingers as a trophy.
Reviewed by Joan Osborne
68-90
ME: (mind racing crazily....she couldn't possibly have said what I think she said) "Uh...."
I've heard Oktoberfest in Fredericksburg, a similar German town not far from New Braunfels, is also great, but I've never been. Anyone else have any suggestions? (I mean, aside from going to the real thing in Germany?)
9. Slankets. Yes or No?
Leah Day
Link your creations below :)
As the leaves continue to fall and the cooler nights and days settle in, I'm looking forward to our second winter here with warmer clothes and hopefully a higher tolerance for the cold than last year. We head to ARGH in a few days to hang out with a whole bunch of our unschooling friends and I'm hoping to get some great photos to share here. Thanks for stopping by!
draft
So here we go my loves...
Is there grey matter in your canned salmon? That’s a good thing. Eat it. It’s healthy fat–the layer of it right next to the skin, white in its raw state and grey when it’s cooked. (Canned salmon is cooked in the can.)
We feel we are not worth love.
Yes, now you know where Bobby Joe derives his pseudonym from…
Hello everyone, It's me Linda again...
Because the little one runs around the room, we've had to keep the rest of the decor fairly sparse and child-friendly. Accessories are mostly functional and there aren't too many things she can get into (unless you count the cordless phone and the iPhone charger... what is it with kids and electronics??)
Well, there we are! They’re the genius endings which became the cliches of the future, watch them and rejoice!
The important thing is that they haven't taken you to a horrible, disgusting, filthy place, full of pestilence, famine and disease. It's just a different place.
5 The Horse
1 small red bell pepper, seeded and diced
Kelly told me today that I had to do a blog post as she was bored of stopping by and seeing a pile of Enid Blyton books so I thought it best I get on with it!
Our gratitude and deepest appreciation to Natasha, Helen and Janette for your support throughout our two pregnancies and for your loving presence at the births of our two beautiful boys, Riker Donald (29-10-09) and Ari Jaden (26-09-11). You will forever hold a special place in our hearts.
contemplate more dawns,
quite disillusioned about the place in which I live.
I've just two problems with that argument. First, IPA wasn't a strong beer in the 19th century. It was about standard strength. I've plenty of examples of a base-level X-Ale Mild that were stronger than Bass IPA (or whatever they called it, I think it was often just Pale Ale) in a given year.
I spend a lot of time talking about gluten-free, dairy-free, egg-free, yadda yadda yadda-free eating. And this is why my recipes are gluten free and dairy free. It's not exactly my idea of the perfect diet, says the cheese-loving egg-nog-missing me. But it has been by far the best choice I could ever make for me and my family.
Slowly, painfully and amusingly.
RR RUEHMR RUEHRN
Not really unaware of her emotions,
So, birthday number 31 has been and gone and it’s been a pleasant one. It’s been a rather more low-key affair than last year’s few days of awesomeness that Andie arranged, but it’s still been a fine day filled with good friends, board and computer games, cookies, coffee and Catan.
And this afternoon I spent playing with Little Pink Flower! She sits on her own now and she loves sitting on the floor, surrounded by her toys. She's also learned how to shuffle, so she's becoming mobile. She's also got 1 tooth through and another almost here. It's amazing how quickly they develop!
I've been to three physical therapy sessions, and have been good about doing my PT exercises twice daily. Compared to working out, the PT exercises don't feel like they're doing much, but they are clearly doing something to strengthen the muscles around my knee and give me more range of motion (a limitation imposed by the meniscus tear).
Christopher, on the other hand, hasn’t had that same battle with the fear. And we love collaborative works…which totally works out for us. He can see something in backgrounds that I make, even when I don’t. If I give up on what comes next on a background, he’ll see something in them and get to work on a foreground. Over time, that has actually helped me see more in my own work, and I have learned to see thing myself. But I still love when he adds to works that I’ve started…
In a wide-ranging interview with HUMAN EVENTS just days before the 10th anniversary of the 9/11 attacks, Mica said screeners should be privatized and the agency dismantled.
"Wow. All these dates with married men. So ... what happened to your vow to not hook up with guys who have boyfriends?" V asked me.
Today is the day for pea and ham soup,
We are people who Christ has come into our lives and now it is time to talk like it. Christ does not want us talking in our old ways but wants us to move ahead. Many of us talked like this before Christ changed us so now we need to be talking like people Christ changed. Many of us find comfort in the past ways we lived but Paul reminds us in Philippians 3 that we are to forget the past and press forward toward the high calling in Christ Jesus. Let us exchange our potty mouth with thankful mouths
What?, you say.
July, 1944
4. What are three of your bad habits?
Opening times: 10am to 10pm daily.
Commander, Pacific Air Forces, Air Component, Commander for the U.S. Pacific Command Commander (’04-’07)
I had help from numerous people along the way. Advisors. Mentors. Professors. Family. Friends. And this site. So now, after being a seeker of help I want to be able to extend some. I think I am going to make a series of posts about getting into a Counseling Psychology PhD program, maybe even including some resources (not that anybody reads this other than my immediate family).
God love the BBC, but they do make some baffling decisions. In Doctor Who, they have more than a TV show, they have a national institution. So what do they do? Monkey around with its scheduling – a split series this year, and the next 13 episodes to be spread across 2012 and 2013 in some unspecified way, like it's some failed American import that no one knows what to do with. Even worse, BBC1's controller, Danny Cohen, put the blame on the showrunner, Steven Moffat, who also executive produces Sherlock. Moffat took to Twitter to respond: "The scheduling of Dr Who has got NOTHING to do with Sherlock", so I'm guessing there was a frosty atmosphere the next time the pair met.
Wrong decisions taken under real pressure,on the move,constant rush building up a mountain of mistakes so tall that the peak is out of sight.A labyrinth of seconds and minutes embroided randomly on the wrong pattern.
There is a lot of talk these days about the legacy we will leave our children and our grandchildren. When I stare into the immediate future, I see a frightening legacy caked in darkness and famine. Instead of intelligently preparing; we find ourselves whittling away this precious time chasing fraudulent theories. We have a decade to prepare, but have a misguided sense of direction and urgency. In ten years from now when the next solar cycle begins; if the sun goes quiet, who will comfort the starving children who cry out in the middle of the night for a small piece of bread?
Since I cannot afford to be defeated
I don't care what the Weather Man said or what the Calendar said...
From our Lake Travis correspondent, although he's reporting from far North Austin. Maybe since it is oddly called the "Marina" location, he thought he was near his house:
The seat of Hougang fell vacant after its ex-WP MP Yaw Shin Leong was sacked from the party for his failure to address allegations over his alleged extra-marital affairs with multiple married women.
The winner will be announced on Sunday, May 1st. Good Luck!!!
_____I try really hard to be as transparent as possible when dealing with women, but usually they can still see me and then I get in trouble
Oddly enough, my post about making the Planet Earth Cake. It easily surpasses every other post I've ever written in popularity. (I set my Popular Posts widget to "Last 30 Days" in order to give the other posts a fighting chance.)
Obviously there are lots of reasons why Jaws is the best film ever, it’s phenomenally awesome being just one, but its quotability has got to rank up there, more people should be using Jaws quotes in everyday conversation. In fact, I positively demand it!
The basic tenant of any wardrobe is to invest in classic and neutral. You hear it all the time in reference to a woman’s wardrobe. If you want to have more options, buy classic pieces that will stand the test of time and then add a couple of trendy pieces for fun. Kids clothes are no different, especially if you have your eyes set on handing down the clothes or reselling them. While it’s true that kids clothes rarely trend as quickly as woman’s fashions, there ARE colors, characters and girls’ dress styles that can become dated. So to maximize your budget, populate the kids wardrobe with classic pants, skirts and tops that can be mixed and matched, then add two or three fun pieces each season.
Dear Archangel Gabriel, I AM open and receptive to knowing myself as creative. I wish to discover my Creative Energy and my creative abilities and I ask that You help me with that. I AM open to your Divine Guidance and Wisdom. Thank You, Archangel Gabriel, for working with me.
2) Step up to the challenge and take the risk of creating our life exactly the way we want it.
Mitt Romney is certain that corporations are people too. But among all the companies he deals with, it is the female corporations that hold a special place in his heart: those daughter companies helping him to shield his income from taxes.
The other man thawed out and made a move – not to the terminal beside him, where a simple command would set off lights, klaxons and certain death for Diggs and his men. Instead, he stepped towards the door. Diggs signaled, sensing his team getting into position immediately. The agent moved closer, and as Diggs tracked his movement, pulled out a small device and put it to the door. A soft signal in his helmet told him the lock was released. Wordlessly they sprang into action.
The leaders of 14 capitalist powers in Europe plus the United States met for a conference in Berlin 126 years ago to decide how all of Africa’s land and vast resources would be divided as colonies and zones of control among themselves. No Africans were invited to the conference.
6.) “Too Long”
Once lost now found
3. I never wear shoes. Well, I wear them to stores and to church and such because of the "No shirt, no shoes, no service" signs, but I never ever wear them at home, outside, or at friends' houses. In fact, when the newspaper people came out to my house to interview me, I wasn't wearing shoes. I especially dislike uncomfortable heels. I wore Converse hightops for my wedding. Barefoot and pregnant - yep, that's me. Except that I'm not pregnant now. Really.
The nouveaute of the brunch was scones. Not just any scones…scones stuffed with fresh blueberries and raspberries, then baked, and topped with homemade butter, which was flavored with raspberry sauce.
And Mountaineers will climb their mount,
The trick, then, is this: as the material produced by Introverted Intuition passes into a larger community, it is adopted in ways alien to its production. The material, to the extent that it acquires a life within the community, depends upon Introverted Sensation for its preservation. That’s where I’ll pick up the next post.
This resulted in taking things in a wrong manner and reacting to all the practices of the roommates. I was living earlier with a group that was always laughing and the new team never used to laugh. I was almost disappointed and this turned into depression and finally problems.
Since they each had 11 questions, I'll just combine them into one 12 question list (to make it even).
The ones that I keep telling myself that don’t exist
Done yet?
Unity of purpose over conflict and discord.
I sent the link to the English teachers who asked their pupils in Year Seven and Year Five for their top reads for my blog in July. The teachers had never heard of it, but were very interested in anything that might be a valuable resource for them and of interest to their pupils. I sent the link to the librarians and schools in south London when I wrote my first blog about the Fabulous Book Award, which The Long Weekend was shortlisted for. They had never heard of it either, but again were very interested. They wanted to read the ramblings of a few scattered authors, and why wouldn’t they? They had read and admired/promoted many of those authors’ books over the years.
I'm interested in working with independant designers/vintage sellers whose products will be of genuine interest to you lot. As well as to me-I wouldn't include links to sellers that I wouldn't be compelled to click on myself. To potential advertisers, drop me a line at smackenziesmith@hotmail.co.uk if you'd like to ask about rates and and the ins and outs of everything. While I get the hang of all of this I'll offer a reduced rate of advertising, whoop de whoop!
Believe that success, truth, love, peace, and joy are all yours and then share them with everyone you encounter. Share truth and love with every relative, friend, passerby, telemarketer, and store clerk you meet. Share peace and joy with every customer, client, student, teacher, taxicab driver, plant, and animal that comes your way. Only through giving do you receive. Nothing manifests outside of a divine plan. Nothing. Whatever you give abundantly, you will receive abundantly. This is the Divine Law. Do this and experience miracles that will blow your mind.
and welcome the comet’s blaze
- Stationary
Asian investors flush with hundreds of billions of dollars in cash now see Latin America as a top business opportunity, and they’re flooding into manufacturing, construction and other industries, particularly in up-and-coming countries such as Brazil, Peru and Mexico. That’s transforming the lucrative relationship that was based primarily on exporting raw materials to Asia, an arrangement that frustrated governments eager to stimulate their own manufacturing.
1. Evolution did not end, or even slow down, with the advent of Homo sapiens. It has actually accelerated.
47. Scarface (Al Pacino)
It was a horrid time when I would blackout for days at a time in the upstairs bedroom, to wake up completely naked, bedding torn off of the bed, covered in bruises and a rash, large knots all over my head. I shook too badly to light a cigarette, or dial a phone for help. I could not move my computer mouse smoothly enough to find out what time and day it was. I’d find realtor’s card on the kitchen table and know that the house, which was on the market, was shown while I was blacked out. I would find myself getting into the car with the express purpose to get drunk while driving. I wrapped my car around a tree in a blackout and ended up in the hospital. Another time a friend could not reach me, and an ambulance came to my home and dragged me out of bed, again naked, and screaming, while my friend cried and watched. I was in the hospital for days, not knowing what day it was, save for the note on the chalk board. I didn’t eat. I could not walk normally. My arms would not swing by themselves, I had to force them to do it. I was weak and spent hour upon day upon month sitting at the kitchen table just staring, even when my kids were over. My hair was falling out.
My memories of Sue are hazy - classes before 11am are rarely appealing to students - but one sticks out. Called into her office, she began applauding my Iraqi background (not the Jewish part, I regretfully failed to disclose) and handed me a theatre flyer promoting the Palestinian plight. I never went back.
Michael Cimino’s second film was the period at the end of a long sentence that was the Vietnam War. Name Your Link">The Deer Hunter may have been the most, sadly forgotten film by many, as it’s rarely shown on television and certainly not on pay cable channels. It was the darkest side of the war that everyone knew was terrible, dark, sad and cruel.
With the availability of new and more versatile products and the huge boomer population offering a receptive market, life insurance agents have a great opportunity to update prospects and clients on innovations. Agents are likely to be the primary—or only—source of this information. Just under half of adults with a financial plan have discussed life insurance with their financial advisor, according to a survey conducted by Saybrus Partners. Among these, just under a quarter (24 percent) said their advisor had recommended adding life insurance. Fifteen percent of those who spoke to their advisors did so more than 10 years ago.
“One of the most worrying aspects is that the ship is still moving on the reef to the action of the seas, which is doing further damage,” he said.
I have done funerals like this in various parts of the country. It was especially important, however, that this funeral took place at Mother Angelica’s Shrine. I remember when she first told me, years ago, that at the heart of her vision for that Shrine was the unborn child. This was to be a place dedicated to the Divine Child, and a place where children in the womb – so easily forgotten and discarded in this culture of death – would be remembered and celebrated.
02 - Bounty Hunter 02:48
“Large quanta of monies stashed abroad, would also indicate a substantial weakness in the capacity of the State in collection of taxes on incomes generated by individuals and other legal entities within the country,” the court had said.
The experimental drug seeks to mimic the gene mutation and block a sodium channel which normally produces nerve impulses that convey pain signals to the brain.
Griffin's promotion of these show how is degrading the nationalist movement to stop intelligent and professional people getting involved. The BNP operates in a hostile environment and has to be run very professionally and after 30 years involvement he knows that. The Security Services strategy is to have people in senior positions who cause disruption, destabilise successful branches, get rid of successful organisers etc.
Seconds emerges directly out of the man’s world of 1950’s American life, when husbands toiled in city offices while wives engineered the suburban home front. As the film begins, our main character, “Wilson,” boards a commuter train home from Manhattan, and a stranger hands him a slip of paper that will change his life – quite literally. What this dour, middle-aged bank manager is offered is a chance for a full life transplant – not merely a fresh start, but a fresh face, body, and identity to go with it. He is surgically transformed into a virile, handsome figure, in the form of Hudson, and given a new life as a painter in a beachside community of Southern California.
For the industry to maintain current levels of quality releases and maintain the growth in production values.
-Take your photo, register with CEA and sign for the Sales System Training (SST) course
time stops as I cradle the fragile moment
We wanna know what your thoughts are on The X Factor contestants lip synching? What do you think about this story? Let us know by commenting on here! Your name and comment may be used on the air!
their basic T-s are like 3 pounds? and some are like 2 pounds?..
Best-seller rock´n´roll, as Tori did,
You can get pregnant the first time you have sex. Always be safe and use birth control and/or a condom until you are ready to have children on your terms.
Happy Birthday to Donetta and Dawnetta my b-day buddies!
Once Again, the Questions:
Maybe it won’t be discusting after all …?
The Fugitive
Dear 2012,
If you have ever been on the 40 across New Mexico and Arizona, there really isn’t a lot out there but some beautiful, wide open landscape.
December is for curling up on the couch with family, a pint of heady stout in hand, Bing Crosby’s seasonal standards competing for aural real estate with the proclamations of lovestruck teenagers tipsy from sneaking sips of Grandpa’s eggnog—“Hey, look, we’re under the mistletoe! You know what that means?”—emanating from the next room and for recollections of Christmases past, not to mention tamales. Tacos, not really. So, before I get anymore yuletide happy and completely forget about tacos, I’d like to offer a list of my 2011 favorites (i.e., those that kept me up late because I was pondering their insides).
Some program heads may cry foul if the university moves towards standardizing grading systems at its institution. They will argue that this action limits their program's/school's autonomy. However, in my opinion, the benefits outweigh any disadvantages when it comes to creating standardized grading systems for graduate students.
Weyerbacher Brewing Company, Inc.Tough blow to Weyerbacher, but the right call, and well-said. Hope it comes back under a new name; it's one of their best beers and one I've been hoping to see more of. It will be back in May: see the comments.
I'm sure you have some questions.
It's apparently vital that, in asking our members to take a decision about a pension scheme which will come into force in three years time, we insist they must decide now. I have to say that, as a member of the ruling body of our Union I do not believe this to be true and have heard no justification for this timetable. However, I know that the majority of my fellow NEC members have a proven track record of unquestioning faith in our "world class negotiators" so there must be some cunning plan behind our seeming to accept the timetable of our adversaries.
The most influential Muslim in Leicester is Shaykh Abu Yusuf Riyadh-ul-Haq , a hard-line Muslim cleric who runs the Al Kawthar Academy , an Islamic school in the city. Ul-Haq, 40, is also the leader of a new generation of "home-grown" British Islamists who loathe Western values, support armed jihad and preach contempt for Christians, Jews and Hindus.
Anyway, last Sunday, 29th April 2012, Father Greg invited many distinguished guests for the 10.30am mass. The reason was because he was going to hand over the cheque of the funds raised during the Food and Fun fair for a church in Vietnam.
It was also great to see two of my friends work on the same page! Suzie of Urban Road and Maree of Little Branch.
However, to some degree, teachers will be teaching the technology simply because global trends will change quickly. Look how fast tablet and mobile computing caught on.
I gape at her. Amy never swears.
“For some of the people involved, this is a very emotional moment,” said Joshua Karsh, a lawyer who represented black applicants who accused the city of employment discrimination. “The city could have cleared this up a long time ago.”
with people all day and that was her goal when she set it up.
Normally, I would try again, as I did with the lime chiffon cake. However, this cake tasted a bit like cardboard and was DEFINITELY not worth the ingredients the first time, let alone a second time.
Live life with a similar flair.
What do you think? For breakfast? With or without an egg? I'd love to get your input.
Benjamin Franklin, one of the founding Fathers of the United States of America is attributed to have quoted, “Early to bed, early to rise; makes a man, healthy, wealthy and wise.” Early to bed implies that one needs to rest at the right time and early to rise implies that one must not rest for more than what they are supposed to. The pursuit of health, wealth and wisdom has always been in man’s interest but as America celebrates labor day on the first Monday of September, even the most ambitious seem to regard this day as a day of rest.
The awards ceremony was shaded and lovely- I finished in 53:59 and won my age group (two overall female 10K winners were between 20-29, and awards categories were only one place deep since it was a small race). Colea placed first in her age group, too.
Nicole checked out Andrew's profile on a different site, and liked what she saw, so she emailed Andrew back and the two began regularly chatting over the internet.
“Something like that,” grinned Hank.
I know, I know – I haven’t blogged for a very long time. I do have a good excuse – I’ve been swamped in work. Never thought a life of a translator could be so busy.
We had a sleep and then spent the evening putting up posters in the town’s four shops, two servos, two pubs and four-and-a-half restaurants. We meet the local cops, who are coming down for a knees-up tomorrow. We also meet a Czech opal miner called Vic who has been over here for 30 years. He has invited us for a kangaroo Bar-B-Q tomorrow. I did not ask if it was a bring-your-own. Jimbo suspects that the Czech opal miner might have a daughter he is trying to marry off.
Boy am I glad it's Friday! I don't really have big plans for the weekend (possibly the KY State Fair?), but the usual - relaxing.
Inside are various exhibits which tell the story of our history in space. Currently, there is a special exhibit commemorating the 100th birthday of Wernher Von Braun. I got pretty excited when part of the exhibit was simply an enlargement of his Wikipedia entry.
1 KRAFT Singles
There was a long line to get inside the museum. As always, lines equal anarchy in France so there was some rule-breaking. Many people jumped out of the main line to go stand in the "group entrance" line. They weren't a group, no matter how badly they wanted to be, and were told they couldn't enter like that but they still didn't budge. This led to a tense French wedge. We will not miss the French wedge when we leave Paris.
It transpires that the cows never go outside.They are all tagged and monitored by computer.Farmer Giles informed us that keeping them inside enabled more efficient care,bedding was always clean, food and fresh water constantly available.They were also safe from any outside environmental infections.
His purpose, however, seems clear in light of the reveal of his illness: August needs to get Emma to believe in the curse so that he can have access to magic that will heal him (he’s dying from an unknown illness). This mission makes him an asset to Mr. Gold…This, plus the Mr. Gold / Regina confrontation in the episode, makes me think that Mr. Gold’s loyalty (while mainly to himself and his lost son) is to Emma/’Child of Snow White and Prince Charming’. At least, for now. The question is, will Emma accept his help?
Within the Non-Residential segment, there are five main groups that the URA has detailed guidelines on:
ARGH!!!
So, come back soon to check that out. Thank you all and have a blessed Sunday.
* When writing a series, do you plan ahead so that when writing the current instalment the sequel is also in your mind and you have a rough idea of what happens next? Or do you try and keep each book as standalone as possible, so that most plot threads are resolved?
With the virtual extinction of the sub-species known as ‘BNP councillor’ Mr Tilbrook’s major source of ‘new’ councillors has probably run dry!
We read in Isaiah 63:1 that the children of God that mourn will be given beauty for ashes. What God is saying here is a beautiful thing. Christ gives mourners the beautiful gift of salvation, wrapped in his righteousness, by the grace of his Spirit. He fills our hearts with His gracious presence, giving us joy, peace, and comfort. This beauty for ashes is not natural thing that any one of us could acquire of ourselves, but is of grace; not acquired, but given. It is not fictitious, but it is real, perfect and complete, and bestowed upon us by Christ himself who gives it to all of us freely.
God cares for you, He cares for what you are going through, He cares for what you had gone through in your life, He cares for you unconditionally, He is concern for you, He gives His full attention upon you.
Williams have a unique rear end set up, with the rear wishbone and rear wing mounting to the same pylon. In early tests other drivers and media suggested the rear wing moving laterally and this was related to the lack of stiffness in this pylon. However Sam Michael has refuted these claims and looking at the rear wing set up, you can see where the movement came from.
From door to door and back again will take me at least 15 hours and the money is so low, I could make more flying to New York, picking up recyclable cans and bottles off the street and redeeming them. The money is so low I’m gonna be too embarrassed to tell Her Majesty’s Revenue and Customs. The money is so low I cannot even be bothered to come up with another simile. Still, I am happy Geoff Whiting asked me.
Manila, the people of Sagada have devised a unique burial ritual involving the placement of dead relatives into caves after carefully preparing a hollowed out log. These coffins are carved by the elderly before they die; if they are too ill or weak their son or other close relative will do it for them. This ritual involves pushing the bodies into the tight spaces of the coffins, and often bones are cracked and broken as the process is completed.
Share by Pat Archbold Wednesday, December 21, 2011 11:11 AM Comments (366)
Yesterday obviously I was cooking all day. I ate very little at thanksgiving dinner - I logged it all in MFP. I did have 3 beers, I did have a SMALL (1/2 regular slice) of pumpkin pie. I still ended the day around 1600 cals - WHY WHY am I up 4 lbs today!?
So my blog has been on hold a bit...
One of the best love stories I know of is a close friend of mine who threw up on the shoes of the Paramedic who arrived in the ambulance to rush her to the hospital. He wrote her poetry, drove long distances to visit with her, even though the visit may only be a few minutes due to her hospitalization and he drove all day as part of his Paramedic duties. They married a couple of years later and will be 18 years wed this year. “Imagine that,” she still says to me, “I puked on his shoes!”
Chicago, always Chicago
Yet, even when we remove survival or the geographical politics of war, it seems as though we strive to create divisions and isolate ourselves in the warm comfort of factions. Recall, yesterday’s post: we don’t want to find the best way, we want our way to be best. And we’ll segregate and re-define the world until that’s possible. It’s easier to exclude those with different perspectives than to consider the validity of their ideas or allow them to help improve our thinking.
Butterflies from stash
Another easy biscuit from the Cup of Tea and a Chat chapter. My glaze ran off the top and went underneath the biscuits a bit. The drizzle gave these little almondy lemon biscuits a seriously lemon kick, we all loved them. Will thicken the glaze a bit more next time, and there will be a next time! If you have a look on Amazon UK there is a little video clip of Miranda making these, if you are interested.
This entire time Toast keeps talking to me , asking what he can do to help. Me all the while ignoring him, until I could not take it anymore and I said, YOU cant do anything. He asked because only Jen can, or because there just isnt anything I can do? I ignored, him, I thought the answer was obvious, after all I had overly emphasized the you. He just kept talking and talking, until I snapped and I kicked him in the head, and told him to shut the fuck up. I was so sick of hearing him talk, there was not a god damn thing he could do, so he needed to just shut the fuck up, or find a way to fucking “fix it”. I did feel dead and empty, now I was full of rage, and it was obvious. So what does he do?
Dude, I'm exhausted just thinking about it and I'm going through it right now!
He was one of the finest poets, funniest men, and most inquisitive minds I've ever known.
91. Gimme Three Steps -- Lynyrd Skynyrd
That’s a lot of competition Pandora will soon have to worry about! This brewing competition for personalized radio users will come down to two main factors: the designs/user interfaces and how well custom stations predict what you want to hear.
Tons of free books at the Library.
To say that the ending was abrupt would be an understatement, and I honestly feel that the break didn’t work at all. McKinley and her publishers should have waited until the whole story was finished and published the whole thing together. If they couldn’t wait, they should’ve found a better way to bridge this book into the next.
Click here to visit Christopher Golden's website:
Jackson has also become quite talkative, and I fall in love everytime he "talks" to me. He can carry on a full conversation with such a serious look on his face, only everything he says is "Jackson talk". Other than the Jackson talk, however, he has learned quite a few words, which is what I'm dedicating this blog to. Here is what we are hearing our little boy say these days:
While the lamb browns, thinly slice the shallots.
Falling apart
However, lately I’ve taken to the habit of skipping almost everything. I refuse to read anything with “Suicide” or “1## People Killed”. I regret that I don’t seem to care who is ruling Northern Ireland, or how much the euro is worth in dollars.
This shit is a huge waste of time.
I used one of the boards that I had already beveled as a template for the fence. Then I used a carcase saw to remove the majority of the waste from the bevel.
When we think of mentoring we most often than not think of the definition of mentoring given at the start of this article, but there is another form of mentoring which is just as powerful and effective as traditional mentoring relationships – peer-to-peer learning relationships.
While I’m not the type to fish for sympathy from my peers, my peers (knowing this full well about me since everyone on my facebook – with the exception of maybe six long time internet buddies – know me in person) continue to fall for these ‘leading headlines’.
Have you heard of CASA? If not, you should check it out. My sister-in-law, Pat, is a CASA volunteer.
Thirty years ago you might have found me reading under the covers. Nothing too shameful - Orwell perhaps, Dickens or Mills and Boon historical. I don't have to hide under the covers any more, but the sense of indulging guilty pleasures still persists. This is with good reason since I should be finishing my essay on Victorian deathbed scenes but hey, everyone deserves a break now and then.
Title: The Summer My Life Began
Goatsnake is a California stoner doom band formed 1996, after the disbanding of The Obsessed (who will reunite for this year's Roadburn festival) and it consists of The Obsessed members Greg Rogers and Guy Pinhas on drums and bass, respectively, as well as vocalist Pete Stahl and Greg Anderson, who also plays guitar in the monolithic Sunn O))). A pretty cool line-up if you ask me, especially considering that Greg Anderson probably uses the same rig he drones with to play sweet bluesy doom for Goatsnake. Also, Pete Stahl's vocals are really nice. They've only released two studio albums so far, but they're well worth checking out if the line-up made you raise an eyebrow.
We believe that in what is the post-Polokwane period, we hope we are going to listen to each other,"said Nzimande.
So here we go... here is the winner of the $20 off ANY single kit or First Month's subscription price from The Paper Bakery! :)
and I am the prophet so don't believe me
I try my best to guide these kids in the right direction, maybe partner them up with different kids hoping something will click but sometimes despite my best efforts it just doesn't happen. It can be heartbreaking to watch but I guess you can't force a friendship.
RTP:
Pack them all up and give them away to your friends. (or eat them...but I guarantee one won't suffice, so you might be 'paying' for it come January --when you need new clothes and a treadmill!)
CAN ANYONE REALLY IMAGINE JESUS CHRIST BEING A HYPOCRITE, LYING, STEALING, CHEATING, COMMITTING ADULTERY, GETTING DRUNK, TAKING POT, DRUGS.. NEVER!
And not care what they think of me
I am now about to leave for band practice, reinvigorated and recharged. I'm antsy to take my little traveler kit, The Alchemist, on the road. I would really like a few upgrades: a bass drum mount for a little crash cymbal, with a little crash cymbal maybe, and a small throne. After those first are acquired I will feel confident enough to take to the streets.
Imagine if you could do it by using simple trigger words to activate involuntary hypnotic “reflexes” in their brains.
You have been building up to this. This is your rightful gift, bestowed on all who have come to be in this glorious developing Golden Age. We of the Company of Heaven are here in full force and presence, to accompany you down the precipitous path of Ascension with Mother Earth.
“Clouds” by Dave Roberts (19)
Characters develop and characters’ characters develop. Usually. Like flowers blooming or carcasses rotting. Nothing stays the same for long.
you're safe here at Nunnery Farm
In the event that – If
I truly did have a fun time making all of the lace flowers and putting this little book together. On the inside I have 4 pages that I have made for the Wedding guests to sign. Then later after the wedding (in June) I hope to get this back from the bride and groom and do a few scrapbook type pages of the wedding. To fill up the album of their day to remember. So if and when that happens I will post the pages in complete form. I really do have some very cool creative ideas going on im my head for the pages.. tee hee heeeee
I'm enjoying online shopping a little too much haha. Next stop... beauty products?!
To close out the trip, me and my coworkers at the Queensview Steakhouse at Parker's Lighthouse. It was the perfect way to close out the trip. While most everyone else had steak (which looked amazing), I decided to go with chicken. I wasn't feeling so great and wanted to keep the evening light. The food was excellent and we had a great view of the Queen Mary.
Although it was fun tweeting Hello world, let’s create an example that reacts to various events and tweets about them. To simulate some events I have connected four buttons to digital inputs (using the button board from chapter twelve). Pressing a button sends of the matching message. However you can use any form of digital output or decision-making in your sketch. For now, here is the example sketch:
The Lenten and Easter Offerings will go to the United Mission International, also called India Transformed. It is a life-transforming ministry in India planting churches and bringing new life to destitute women and children. UEMI is approved by the NALC Executive Council as a Recognized Ministry of the NALC.
If he hadn’t identified himself…I wouldn’t have known who it was. Because I deleted his damn number a month ago!! Same with Match guy above…I couldn’t have emailed him…because I deleted his info too.
You may have noticed that my posting pace has slowed down a bit this week. I've had an issue with my hip joint that escalated for the past 7 months. I've spent that time working through various therapies and treatments. Unfortunately they didn't work. It reached the point that I had to have some major surgery done to repair the problems. Happily, I've made it through the surgery and I'm now home starting my long road to recovery!
Now bi-polar, there, ya got something. Numbers have gone up 4000% for children. Next thing ya know, it's gonna be "Bi-polar Speaks". Instead of a puzzle piece, it'll be a bicycle, or a bow-tie, or something. Two eyeballs going cross eyed.
Now for your questions, should you choose to answer:
LOVE this picture I took of the girls this weekend,
“Since the world is again in the midst of an economic crisis, the arguments here are not without contemporary relevance, even if from today’s perspective it is a polemic where everybody is right. Summing up: recommended.” —A. Ezergailis, Choice
3. A survey of church records relating to the alleged victims of abuse and the
It gets even more interesting when a photographer, unknowingly, takes an image of a couple who are in an extramarital affair and publishes that photo, that couple can press charges against the photographer for invasion of privacy. Crazy!! I will point out that no one to this day has been charged in this manner. So, you can see why I think twice, or over think, about taking photos in a crowded area.
Betty White was right.
My advice to you, if you are trying to cook, keep your expectations real low from yourself. and now that i am hungry, i am going to boil some milk, add a heavenly quantity of hot chocolate powder and sinfully drink to sleep. what a mess. and i threw bottle gourd as well. haw its painful to throw away food you imagined eating on your dining table. god! i am going to live on fruits for the whole next month now until mom is here.
As of 04/30, _______________ (my cell phone number) has used approximately 50% of data allowance for the bill cycle ending the 4th. Check verizonwireless.com for details.
SMALL STRAWS IN A SOFT WIND by Marsha Burns–02/02/12:
us powerful and favored. Almost
And now he has,
(4) The format of the sayings gospel is derived from Jewish Wisdom literature, and seeks to preserve not an historical or biographical history of Jesus, but rather a collection of his teachings in the form of isolated sayings or hypothetical dialogue. While no sayings gospels were canonized into the New Testament, most scholars theorize that such a gospel (“Q“) was used as a source by Matthew and Luke.
All I can say is I am soooooo embarassed.
I am a newlywed, only been married a few months. My schedule has remained the same. I’ve always had an insane work schedule that keeps me pretty busy 6 days a week and now suddenly my new bride is accusing me of cheating on her instead of working. I’m not cheating, but she is adamant in her accusations, and I think she may have a guilty conscience. I need my wife to either be secure in my marriage or come clean about cheating. How can I fix my already failing marriage?
After being forcibly exiled from their land, the people kept faith with it throughout their Dispersion and never ceased to pray and hope for their return to it and for the restoration in it of their political freedom.
Drawing on two surveys, the General Social Survey and the National Congressional Study, Mark Chavez, a professor of sociology, religion, and divinity at Duke University, author of “American Religion: Contemporary Trends”, concluded that traditional belief and practice is relatively stable, but that confidence in religious institutions has declined more than confidence in secular ones.
During this time of year, there just doesn't seem to be much extra time for fun things. So when persuasive writing was the next writing unit that came up right around Easter with my current second-graders, I started looking around on Pinterest (where else?). And I was not disappointed. I found this fabulous Easter Bunny application posted by Welcome to Room 36.
We’ve previously touched on the reasons why we shouldn’t copy other authors, but we can learn a great deal from them by finding and developing our own inspiration and creativity.
Then again, there is also plenty of circumstantial evidence pointing to the fact that criminal elements, who ‘appear’ to have no connected with government, can also get away with murder. Despite the high level of sophistication in law enforcement and intelligence, there are far too many unsolved crimes in the country. One thus cannot help but wonder whether the actions of these criminal elements are possibly linked to supervised and controlled projects of the NIA, or any another intelligence agency for that matter! It is a debatable an extremely thorny issue, but when one takes into account the cunning ‘intelligence’ of these agencies (pardon the pun), then one cannot ignore the possibility that these crimes are intentionally left unsolved.
Currently the bedroom looks like this:
Your adorable pudgy hands and of course those sweet baby cheeks that I so want to kiss!
ribbons wink in her direction
Contact Tracy at tlwstudios@msn.com for
Well earlier in the week Melanie (corner left of the mosaic above) told me that 'SIBOL' was in 'Knit Today'. I have been patiently waiting all week to get hold of a copy and this afternoon I bought one from our supermarket.
Add the milk and sugar into a medium sauce pan on low/medium heat and mix until the sugar dissolves. When you see bubbles appearing around the edges of the pan, pour a couple small scoops of milk into egg yolks while whisking to temper egg yolks. Add the yolk/milk mixture into the milk pan and continue whisking on low/medium heat until a light custard is formed. This process takes about ten minutes.
The real test will come when we can see true year over year results.
when we bought it but now I just don't know where to begin.
The cheese-like substance inside a Hot Pocket is not cheese.
been verrrry busy as of late - not much time to post things! anyway, here is a daycare that i painted last week. it was really fun, and the kids watching me everyday from the room next door were sooo cute!
Financially-speaking, the most important aspect of marketing is knowing how to sell your products. With all this attention you've drawn to your website, you have to know how to operate a digital store. Paypal is the industry standard for accepting payments, but you'll also need to make arrangements to accept the major credit cards. To protect your customers, you'll have to know how to use https.
I am strengthened in my personal relationship with him by my worship of him and receiving him in Holy Communion at Mass; through my prayer, devotion and reading of the Scriptures; by my study of the teachings of the faith; through my good works prepared beforehand by him for me to perform while in his grace.
to the mauve lake
Now, I grew up in a small town where, if you had shit to sell, you called and did it over a local AM radio show called “Swap and Shop“. Washing machines, old skates, retainers, you name it, bitches were selling it. Tickets, however, were strictly prohibited items. This left me with the impression that scalping was a highly illegal activity. So I was surprised to learn that, here in Toronto, it’s not only not enforced- but a lucrative underground enterprise. There were at least 100 scalpers trawling the grounds, and we thought this would be a walk in the park…until we started talking to a few of them, and realized we had entered a tangled web of scalping hierarchy.
And like the rich (and those who are convinced that a rigged system can make them rich) homos who pollute all discussion everywhere with historical revisionism and history-doesn’t-matter-because-we-fucked-the-T-for-so-long-that-we-have-the-power-to-declare-that-history-doesn’t-matter-ism, the lower-taxes-first arm of gay buffonery (remember Ths John’s quickly-deleted whine about how the last Dubya-era rebate didn’t benefit him?) is as much of a cancer on the body of working-class and/or non-DC LGBT progress as overt, classic Chris Crain-ery.
The HHS states that patient and consumer organizations are already playing a role in raising public awareness and developing information, tools and resources to help patients and families effectively engage with their providers to avoid preventable complications. Partnership for Patients welcomes additional patient and consumer participation.
$1.50 off TWO packages Kellogg's Cereals
So I dandered back home, back to my 'work station' to map out my plan.
For the purposes of crowning some favorites for the season, I’ve tried to stick with initial impressions and thus, have settled upon Shiner Holiday Cheer, Gordon Biersch Winter Bock and Pyramid Snow Cap as my Christmas and Winter Seasonal favorites.
I loved the school setting for this, but it caused problems for me (my only issue with this episode). A) I have never seen a school that big or modern, making me think it was shot in a college or uni outside of termtime. And B) I dunno whether this is in fact THE RICHEST SCHOOL IN THE WORLD, but in my school we have classrooms which the teachers lock, and front doors which the janitor locks and thats it. There are about 4 security monitors on the exterior gates and doors, and that (again) is it. We sure as hell don't have computerised locking systems which would be at home in a prison. Nor do we have CCTV cameras in ever corridor and classroom. That jarred a leetle.
All in all, I no longer feel broken or damaged. Scarred? Yes, of course. But over time scars fade and new growth begins.
Everything you are and everything around you is always telling you the opposite of what you are trying to convince yourself of.
Re-Juice A Nation offers boosts to add to your smoothies (like fat burners, energy, protein, multi-vitamin, etc). I opted for a protein boost, since I was drinking a semi sweet and sugary breakfast in the form of a smoothie. Extra protein can help reduce a sugar high!
Cool for 2 hours.
3) Be patient as they’re learning our culture. Much of what you consider to be simple or common sense is brand new and unfamiliar to them. In my documentary the Sudanese boys had to have all kinds of things explained to them, like why they need to wear deoderant, how to pay their rent, where to get food, etc. It’s all brand new and it’s really really overwhelming. Be patient.
I have been using a lot of carrots and pumpkins for my regimented weekday dinners. Apart from being a rich source of vitamin A, I begin to discover the immense natural sweetness of these two ingredients and have been planning to create a dish to just showcase this character, hence the cream of carrot and pumpkin. I used a stock of sun-dried local anchovies and pork bones, which were simmered for almost an hour. It’s an easy starter to prepare – just pureeing the softened mirepoix of carrots, onions, garlic and pumpkin with toasted dried shrimps and stock. No cream of any kind was used. I topped the dish with a crack of black pepper and a drizzle of truffle oil. I should have omitted the latter as its scent was overshadowed by the pungency of the dried shrimps. The sweetness of the cream was expectedly intense. The dried shrimps gave the starter an Asian twist, which I thought was interesting. This was served with slices of dark rye sourdough.
lot of stuffs goin on with my life for the past few weeks or should i say month yes month... stressful days for my sis's wedding, assignments to be done and also my personal life as well... but lets keep that aside coz its done and now i finally got the time to spend it on my bloggie! damn i miss you!
"Me and my teddy bear, we got no worries, we got no cares......
-scrap paper (I used scrapbook paper) and cut them into long thin strips )about 2 x 6 inches. Use lots of different coordinating designs and colors. Have fun with this!
4. When did you leave your country?
Phil and I squeeze into a minibus and sit back to admire the stunning views of looming green mountains either side of the winding dirt road, where each bend prompts the driver to beep a few times to prepare for any oncoming truck, pedestrian or, as in one case, baby donkey.
"Joyful" her colleague stated in a flat, dulled tone, which retrospectively was quite amusing.
Me on the other hand didn't really care....It served its purpose. It wasn't like any other robe...it actually absorbed water. It covered me very nicely. It has been a good friend for many years.
I assume that you mean between Barack Obama and Willard Romney. If I had to choose between those two, I’d choose Mitt. However, I would have liked to see Rick Santorum become president. And if you’re referring to anyone that’s alive in the world now, I’d have a pretty hard time choosing. If you mean anyone that has ever lived, then excluding Jesus Christ, I’d have to pick either George Washington or Abraham Lincoln. Maybe even Robert E. Lee, but that’s a different story.
Unlike my country, Denmark, Japan is crazy about jingles. Most Danish people consider jingles a plague that should be kept away from society and if introduced immediately cured. Lounge music is okay though. Japanese people have jingles everywhere. You know when you push that button to get to the other side of the sidewalk a sort of beeping sound begins, to indicated when it’s okay to go. This is to help blind people know whether they should stay or they should go. In Japan they made a minute-long jingle for this. Actually they didn’t make it, they just ripped off some classic song; sometimes Itsy Bitsy Spider.
35. Makes me feel safe. I can know without a shadow of a doubt that he would do whatever he had to in order to protect me.
2 generic
I do not pretend to know what went wrong. Olojede has been reported as saying that the paper was losing money and that it could not attract the official advertising patronage that is the lifeblood of most Nigerian newspapers – patronage that often comes at a huge price.
but i am doing a lot of collaborations. writing Waveform with Denise Leto changed my whole concept of how it would be possible, more than possible for me to continue to write. it gave me a new way in that was social and somatic practice. it made it Mambo Italiano at the top of my lungs and too much cheese. Collaboration (as a poet) brings the body and other lives into the work, in just about he only way that makes sense to me; in terms of justifying to myself, how i spend my time, how art has spiritual or practical efficacy. Collaborating is also a form of documenting one's knowing of another (being-in-time together), which to me, has always been the thing. So, collaboration is documentary poetics, also.
Odendaal HJ. Adverse effects of maternal smoking on preterm labour and abruptio placentae. International Journal of Gynecology and Obstetrics 2001; 74: 287-288.
I'm not a total moron, I'm cautious at the crosswalks. I love my dog too much to just walk ahead, balls out, eye forward, point being made. So I'll stand there, and count on your knowledge of basic driver/pedestrian laws to slow your vehicle down so I can cross. Please don't honk at me, or shout garbled insults at me, or sit there and gun your engine as I cross (all of which happen on a regular basis). Someday it will be your kid on her bike trying to cross, or your wife with your baby in a stroller, or your mom and her Xanax prescription clutched in her hands. Have mercy on us all, please.
Bracelet bars by CapturedMoments--these are FABULOUS. They're big! Perfect for bracelets. I like the little ones too. My favorites are the brown ones (the big one is called "Treasure Chest"--it's ceramic but it looks like leather).
Don’t get me wrong. As far as theology is concerned, Carson mostly is right on target. He never deviates from his essentially Reformed Calvinist point of view and even though he never once mentions the name ‘NT Wright’ (he does get in a dig at Steve Chalke and Alan Mann in the note on page 69) one can sense that underneath much of what Carson writes is a polemic against the so-called ‘new perspective on Paul’ and what many in the Reformed camp feel is a threat to the grip they have on theological power that goes along with the Reformed interpretation of the atonement (viz., penal substitution). I find it hard to believe that something so obvious needs so much defense.
Nothing would surprise any of us about Newscorp’s sleazy grip on the British governmental process. But this IoS investigation does all of us a service, in that it rubbishes the idea of a squeaky clean George Osborne who knew nothing about the deep waters his friend David Cameron was treading. Indeed, it suggests that Ozzie and the Prozzie may be what helped get the Prime Minister into this mess in the first place.
This was taken from the Illinois Law website two years ago - Since than they have altered the court order portion most likely since this article was posted.
The grilled trout was fresh, sweet, and perfectly cooked. It was very lonely on the plate though, sitting on top of four asparagus spears and nothing else. At $26, it would be nice to have a little rice, or even some bread served alongside.
But, I hope that even as things are challenging, we can still rely on our family and friends to lift us up when we need it.
I'm also surprised that this husband and wife team were not arrested under one of the numerous anti-terrorism laws we have inherited from nuLabor. Certainly questionable behaviour to say the least.
(Jack) Since most of my readers are either authors or book enthusiasts, can you provide a quick dossier of publishers you have worked with?
I recently heard the poem Wild Geese by Mary Oliver, and I loved it very much. I’d never heard of Mary Oliver before. And now a few days later I came across when death comes, the poem inserted into a book of which the pages did not turn for an hour, as I read over and over again the words spread across a two-page fold at the beginning of a chapter, Mary Oliver’s poem when death comes, and I never grew tired of it.
your community.
And so tonight you won’t be mine,
9. In The Morning
*3/4 cup caster sugar
Lt. General Claudia J. Kennedy, USA (Ret.)
And a flange of baboons;
You are Lee Everett, former college professor and husband, who finds himself headed to a maximum prison when the zombie apocalypse hits. Literally. Alone and injured he must muster enough strength to find help. After run-ins with the undead, he meets Clementine, an innocent child who somehow survived the past days up in her tree house. Her family on vacation, she’s been staying with a neighbor. The intersection of these two individuals, both alone and looking for a family, begins the tale.
also, sorry we didn't bring a camera this time round so you could get some sense of it all... i sort of hate taking pictures in a place where you already stick out like a big white sore thumb, but maybe everyone will just come and visit so we can show you around in person? they have tex-mex! :)
On Wednesday I went and took a biology course in Norwegian at the adult education centre. I found out I knew woefully little about the workings of the human heart. Walking back into town, I saw an eagle circling up above the mountain and I stopped to watch it for a time. They can move such a distance in such a short time. I felt very earthbound for the rest of my walk.
Hyper Island’s CEO Johanna Frelin said the partnership with GS&P is the first in a series of fellowships the school is planning.
Surf! I watched my partner, Mike, learn to surf when we lived in San Diego, and though I have lived close to the coast most of my adult life and love to body surf, I have never learned to surf. Some part of me pines for that. A sense of a missed moment and experience. Being in the ocean is extraordinary. Delicious. And pretty terrifying at times. Not much fun to be pinned down by a wave or caught in a rip. Still, I loved body-surfing when I was pregnant, letting go into the water, becoming weightless and graceful, immersed in something entirely other, that was a great pleasure.
He continued that IP-Converge’s Managed Data Services which include data center co-location that uses APC technology as well as Internet bandwidth and connectivity, can address such requirements without the huge capital investment.
The thing is, it’s more likely that my kids will be brought home to me by some interfering, judgmental adult who will shake their finger at my Free Range attitude, than it is that my kids will be kidnapped or hurt by them or anybody else.
I weirdly love that the cabinets are high gloss gray! And, that thick counter slab. Is it marble or some type of composite? I can't tell. Does anyone know?
And for those of you who've asked, I'm planning on making it available to buy as a poster. Have patience.
Turkcell’s complaint cites violations of the Alien Tort Statute, a 1789 law that gives U.S. courts jurisdiction in some instances to consider claims by foreigners for illegal conduct that occurred in another country. The law is usually cited in human rights and torture cases.
“My friend and I talk on the phone a lot. Yesterday I was very busy and I forgot to phone. When I did he reamed me out like I was a schoolboy who did not do his homework. What do you think I should do?”
They both looked amazing, as they always do. Everyone in the room knew her name, while the film star Cameron Diaz added even more elation to the evening by wearing a dress from Victoria’s new collection.
Let the dish sit for 10 minutes to set. Garnish with basil.
Since his fellowship pays for his schooling, expenses and gives him a stipend we will have paid a whopping $0 for Grad school for him. Shut the front door. The stipend has allowed us to pay off all of our debts and helps supplement the ridiculous rent (compared to free rent in Provo), utilities and gas. It is a huge blessing and I thank Heavenly Father everyday for that blessing.
This week we heard the Daly’s claim that German bank Deutsche Bank had been interested in acquiring, for “hundred of millions” the €457m of loans owing to NAMA. NAMA’s action will have put an end to David’s involvement in those talks which he had initiated. Oddly enough Deutsche Bank was the bank cited by Paddy McKillen’s Maybourne group last year as being a candidate to re-finance that group’s loans which were NAMA-bound. According to RTE, the court was told by David’s barrister that he had always had a good relationship with AIB and never missed a payment and ominously perhaps for NAMA, that there were similarities between David’s business and Paddy McKillen’s. Like Paddy, David’s properties generated enough rent to cover interest payments and like Paddy, David had no opportunity to make representations to NAMA before his loans were acquired.
I am so thankful to have discovered the these little beauties. They have definitely saved me from a life of uselessness...and I know that sounds a little ridiculous, but it really is true.
But, don’t think God will reveal so much to you, when He has revealed it to others already. Our Father is always working on the principle of the Body of Christ. He reveals something to one and something else to another. If we want further revelation of Christ, we must stand on the shoulders of those who have gone before us. Then we will be able to go deeper into the Promised Land, that wonderful, all-inclusive Christ.
Austinites can sample the award-winning Convict Hill Stout at two of the original stores to sell Independence beers: the Whole Foods on Lamar on Sunday, January 15 and January 22 from 1-3 pm, and at Wheatsville Co-Op on Saturday, Jan 21, 12-3pm. Independence fans are encouraged to attend a celebration happy hour at the Ginger Man Pub on January 20, 6-8 pm.
Fallacy number 1 – “We only do high level work”
...I eventually plucked up courage to write on it and yep I knew I was right...
You probably have all you need in your pantry and fridge, so call a few friends, set a pretty table, open a bottle (or two) of wine, and enjoy. Très français.
What nerve….(takes deep breathes)….I got a little angry there. Look i am not trying to make him sound like an ass. I am simply stating what i feel and what i see through my own eyes. For one, i cant trust my “new” friends now because i fear they are going to spill any secret i tell them Second of all, you sneak around behind my back setting up meetings so i can see who i replaced. (HECK NO! that will make any girl go mad. Why rub the fact you have her former man in their face. That is just cruel) Thirdly, i tell my best friends (thats 2 if your counting) my problem and they ADVISE ME. Not advise me then turn around and gush my whole problem to people. Why would you do that? I obviously need to re-evaluate my friendship making code. I am too nice with new people. I trust them a lot and most of the time i get zip. No trust, no acknowledgement. Nothing.
We come together now
What is exciting about SlutWalk is the same thing that is important about Walk for Choice. Both movements sprang up spontaneously, are independent of any mainstream women’s organizations, are made up of young women, most of them in their 20s who are angry and radical and determined to make a difference.
Coming July 10, 2012
It was an excellent drop-in sink, especially for people like me who don’t like to have fancy soap dishes or jars around. My preferred method of dealing with soap is to rest it on the ledge, next to the faucet – but with many sinks, the soap easily falls off the ledge into the sink or onto the counter, or soapy, slimy water builds up under the soap or at the edge of the sink on the countertop.
In the past two weeks there have been a couple nights here and there were he's stirred and latched on for a minute or two without really nursing around 3:30am, but for the most part, he's sleeping until 5:00. I feel like saying, "It's been so wonderful!"would be a lie because really, like I said, I didn't really even notice it. I suppose it's nice? Well, what's nice is that he got to this point on his own, when he was ready. I do love that! What I'm loving better is that less nighttime stirring equals less nighttime wetting. He's been waking up with a dry diaper for several days now. Wonderful!
Priorities are another big issue. Problem is, these change too. Which horse is a priority? Which one takes more work? Do I start with the easy ones or the horse that will be more time consuming? The easy horse will make more progress in a shorter amount of time and I can go do stuff with them, while the slower learner is going to take longer to bring along, but once they figure things out- it's set for life.
Article 66 of CSIR bye-laws, no patent can be licensed without the permission of the ‘Management Council’ of CSIR. Again thanks to this clause in the Bye-Laws, CSIR HQs would have had to have maintained a copy of any patent licensing deals. Why apply to 39 different labs?
A couple of weeks ago we visited the William Herschel museum in Bath. William Herschel was a musician and astronomer and from his residence in Bath, which is now the museum, he discovered the planet Uranus in 1781.
Many people believe that hiring an attorney should be the last resort. This is a serious misunderstanding. When you or a loved one is hurt in an accident, you often end up trying to deal with an insurance company representative. These people are trained to get the best possible deal for the insurance company. They will often seem like they are on your side; they are not. Their job is to make sure you get the least amount of compensation possible (and getting you zero is best)!
I love to get my "we will not be moved" swerve on.
First of all, I apologize for the month of February in which I completely forgot to post its film previews. Hope you’ve all still enjoyed this month’s films.
He reached over and took my wrist easing me over his lap. His gentleness was going to break me.
I paused, considered how best to explain it. “Hope. Joy. Peace. A sense of purpose. A sense of belonging.” It felt, in that moment, like a testimony.
Approach it and there is no beginning;
That made me think about the kinds of promotion that publishers pay booksellers for - inclusion in the Books for Giving Christmas catalogue, table position, window displays. Isn't it a bit similar?
YouTube Compatible
The next couple of months were torturous. I expected to hear from Acadia within the next month. March came and went. April came and went. May began, and my head teacher continued to ask me if I had heard from Acadia.
We had a lovely weekend in Hilton Head at my friend Tami's wedding. While she and her husband are now off to their honeymoon in Bermuda, we came home to work drama, an out of town husband starting today, and a broken air conditioner. I was debating challenging myself to 30 days without wine starting today, but I'm thinking twice about it. Oh well, you don't get the good without the bad, do you?
“The environmental program now underway at the Weapons Complex is in the very early stages, and little actual cleanup has been done. It may be impossible with current technology to remove contaminants from many groundwater plumes and deeply buried soils within reasonable bounds of time and cost. Many sites may never be returned to a condition suitable for unrestricted public access.” (Box A, pg. 7).
The rampage began right away this morning. As Breitbart.com reports, chants of “fuck the police” and “here, piggy, piggy” in San Francisco were accompanied by the throwing of molotov cocktails, breaking of windows, throwing of garbage cans, graffiting of private property with anarchist symbols and slogans, and general vandalism.
ONE MOMENT … can change your life … forever
To fill it, hold it in your hand, take a spatula, put some frosting on it, and place it slowly into the bag. Then, pinch your fingers down on it and slide the spatula out. Now, fold the edges down, and you have your pastry cone.
Abenaki have been permanently settled at Odanak since ca 1700. Odanak is a quiet village that invites relaxation and discovery. Before they settled there the Abenaki knew this as a place of wealth where migratory birds such as Geese and Snow geese make a stop-over during migration. Perch and Walleye (Sandres) abound and climb Alsigontegok "tall grass to the river" to spawn. The soil is rich and fertile. A recent study has shown that the highest concentration of medicinal herbs in the north-east region is located at Lac St-Pierre about 16 km from Odanak.
I was reminded of this while reading a recent crime story.
i love my family. the loud. the crazy. the more crazy. this weekend, however, they were out of town and it was absolute bliss.
Page # Description
Yesterday I received a couple of pictures from a friend in Holland.
for what it knew was not to be
The couples falsely stated on legal documents that they were living together as husband and wife when they were not and had no intentions of doing so, according to the indictment. The fraudulent marriages allowed the Bulgarians to obtain rights and privileges that allowed them to stay in the country without having to apply for authorization from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Service.
There, Bob has his evidence. As I have said, if you are going to accuse a Catholic priest of subterfuge and blatant dishonesty you should at least get your facts straight. The fact that Bob dug his heels in over his blunder concerning the office held by Fr. Olivieri, instead of just forthrightly admitting he was wrong, is just another testament to his own lack of scholarly integrity.
This simmering mixture is a spin on Sandi’s beef filling. It contains sofrito, ground beef, tomato paste, lots of other herbs and spices, alcaparrado, plus Jason’s suggestion… chorizo. Later on, we made some spicy black bean and cheese, hummus (yes, hummus), and some sweet empanadas filled with bitter orange marmalade and ricotta cheese, and fig with queso fresco.
RachelYeomans Yes! For Twitter, you start w/ building an audience, then maybe host a twitter contest and then perhaps a twitter chat!
Shows a ring
Not only did she WOW the judges with how she implemented the Razberry Dazzle color scheme into her layout but she also amazed them at how much of a C.S.D. Sweetheart she truly is. She's rocking the C.S.D. Link Badge, she made sure to leave a working C.S.D. link in her blog posting and she didn't forget to mention our June sponsor. All power to you Mo!
-Artificially low interest rates courtesy of quantitative easing by central banks
I read once that you could determine someone’s impulse control by observing how they consume hard candy. If they slowly savour it, they have excellent control. If they crack into it with flashing molars like a toothy, ravenous wolf devouring a deer, their impulse control isn’t so great.
Soo, how might POTUS and the whole Beltway establishment better connect with and follow public opinion? By doing whatever is popular in this minute's opinion poll:
*I am super stressed these days, so I am trying to get out for a mom night out at least once a week for coffee, if not, then just out by myself, shopping, coffee, something. I need this.
Well, ready or not, it comes anyway. I just really felt like I needed just ONE more month of summer. We really were jipped this year with all the surgeries. I guess there's always next time right, and hey...my kids can breathe...
This rust midi skirt gets the preppy treatment with a sleeveless shirt and Marni-inspired platform sandals. Top tip? Thoughtful details like these animal print socks and matching belt add personality to your look.
Hey - I might need them someday.
I am going upstairs now to fill Andrew and Rhiannon's stockings... one of those things that hasn't changed yet.
Then I got an assignment from a pretty respected German newspaper, the Süddeutsche Zeitung, which was great! but I wasn't entirely prepared for it. I had to scribble and circle around the subject for a bit, then write it one or two paragraphs at a time, on the subway to work, or in moments stolen from my real job: Father. So I was barely able to write anything else--not even Facebook updates.
Australian Destiny, No.1
I soon found out that the abstract concept didn’t fit well for him.
Record – Somers 9-0.
“Where in the world did all this people come from?!!!”
“What?” said Wifesy.
“Yeah, a few times.”
Stamps: Magnolia - Magnolia with Butterfly - Butterfly Dreams Collection 2011
2. i’m not big with photography. it seems 70% of all FP have a landscape or artsy/city theme with pictures that i could never take with my kodak whatever-it-is that shoots great pics outside but has trouble in the dim light of my kids’ dance recitals and school plays. and of those 70%, 95% of those have to do with international travel. i’ve only left the US twice, and that’s if you count a carnival cruise to the caribbean. the one time i went out of the country, to italy, it was only for a weekend. don’t ask.
I have added some Stickles picket fence and
If I wanted to dance predominantly 'nuevo' style, I'd advertise that fact with more fashionable trousers that put a lot more emphasis on the hips. I'd probably choose different tops too, again bringing the eye to the hips rather than the shoulders, and I might try to create a more broken outline with less visual formality generally, in a different choice of colours and fabrics.
preparing for our first visitors that are arriving today. See, we have been living in our little apartment for six months now, but if you were to walk in the door you would think nobody lives here.
13For, brethren, ye have been called unto liberty; only use not liberty for an occasion to the flesh, but by love serve one another.
Fuller's London Porter—This beer blows me away; I can hardly believe how good this is. This very dark brown (not black) beer starts with slightly thick mouthfeel that leads to a creamy, slightly roasted, slightly bitter but perfectly balanced follow-through of porter perfection. Bittersweet chocolate, coffee, and I catch a touch of licorice. The first time I tried this, I had a Fuller's London Pride and the London Porter in the same evening (12 Aug 2002) and I have never tasted two such great beers together, ever.
I do sincerely apologize that your server on Saturday did not communicate clearly with you how the Eat The Whole Menu should have been applied to your party. That mistake ruined what should have been a fun and enjoyable evening for you. I appreciate your feedback on this and it will be used constuctively. I assure you that I will address how this particular issue gets handled in the future so that our efforts to accomodate our guest will end up pleasing them. I know that we probably won't be seeing you again at The Bent Brick but your feedback will be used to improve our service in the future. I hope that you will put this response, unedited, on your blog. I will put this exchange on the Bent Brick blog so that our followers can see how we are trying to improve their experience night in and night out.
We'll keep you updated on here and on Twitter. Be sure to follow Shauni on Twitter, you can find her link on the right hand column.
10-Nation Of Finks
And now for the big one... this is the one that devastates me the most. My grandmother is in hospice. And it totally sucks. Granted, she has lived a long and wonderful life, and has lived it without regrets and with abandon. It's just so hard to see the shell of a woman that she once was. So vibrant and full of life, and now she can't even open her eyes. She has a double whammy of Parkinson's and dementia. A few weeks ago, she pretty much stopped eating and drinking. They are estimating 1-3 months. We think it's closer to one. I went to see her the other night, and spent a few hours with her. I was fine until they came to put her to bed. They have to put her in a lift to move her into bed now. I should have left sooner, but as I was walking out, I looked back and saw her suspended in the lift, and I almost lost it. For the first time I realized that this is it. I've decided that getting old is cruel and unnatural punishment for a life well lived.
Blouse $47 Saks Fifth Avenue Off Fifth
4) From Genesis 12:1 to Malachi 4:6, there are 926 chapters. With the probable exception of Job, and some of Proverbs, they all deal with the one Nation Israel. The other nations spoke of are only those nations that have dealings WITH Israel. All of the 39 Books, from Genesis to Malachi, were written by Jews. Read Romans 3:1, and Romans 9:4-6. If Luke was a Jew, then the 27 Books of the New Testament were written by Jews.
So we decided to split the program in 3 levels: a suspended volume, wood structured for the 5 suites, so they would be on the trees´ crown/top; a plan, the concrete slab elevated from the ground to support all of the program social activities, living, dining room the kitchen and the swimming pool; and underneath it, on ground level there is a small enclosed area for services. A small accommodation for a house keeper couple, a laundry and a deposit.
But a reader sent me the below picture as a reminder of what used to be there. I had no idea. I know in its own way, the facade of The Magic Pan is as ugly as the Jekyll & Hyde Club. But there's something about that chain that charms me. Nothing quite says New York in the 1970s like The Magic Pan.
…okay.
“Can it be both?” you may wonder. Some popular soteriology (efforts to explain how we are saved, from what we are saved, and who does the saving) tries to affirm both. However, the way the gospels tell the story, it makes it difficult to do so because no one is portrayed as happy on both Friday and Sunday. Jesus’ disciples grieve on Friday and rejoice on Sunday, while the political and religious establishment (the domination system of the day) rejoices on Friday after removing the dissident troublemaker and grieves his reappearance on Sunday. It seems to be an either/or not a both/and choice.
All in all, it’s a good movie. You can watch it one time if you like romantic films. You will be able to stand it just fine. If you like movies which are modest, real and whose scripts don’t try to act smart, you’ll love this movie.
The ten year hunt for Osama Bin Laden finally concluded with Navy Seals assassinating the infamous terrorist, and for once, Barack Obama had no need to say “This began in the Bush Administration!”
This recipe is chocolate ice cream with a twist. At the very end of the freezing cycle, you throw in some blueberry preserves. Mostly, the blueberries disappear. Occasionally, however, a lump of preserves pops up for a sweet and fruity surprise. The photos really do show some of the blueberries, even though the color contrasts aren't evident. I can see them. Can you?
But she is a fantastic cook. The ladies of the Maronite Catholic community in her new town took her in and made her a “kibbe” lady. In between her 15 jobs of piano teaching and playing organ, my mom makes kibbe (a ground meat dish) and kaak (Lebanese cookies made with a date filling). If my husband ever has thoughts about leaving me, he remembers the kaak my mom sends him, and he reconsiders. It’s like a sweet insurance policy.
I'm looking forward to speaking along with a rock star group of bloggers on brand blogger relationships on the 26th. I hope to see you there!
Paper Studio - 'Carries beautiful artist papers and a wide selection of bookmaking/binding products as well as a lot of other great multi media and journaling supplies.'
All our love to Monica Sone's family and friends and to our Monica Sone and Betty MacDonald Fan Club members,
2. Keep It Simple, Stupid.
Sentiment computer generated
I put off making the call all morning, so it was after two o’clock in the afternoon that I found myself in front of the telephone with the family’s number scribbled on a post-it beside me. I’d spent all morning playing with the dog in the back garden, the sun streaming through the trees. He was a bright, intelligent dog who appeared to enjoy playing fetch and didn’t suffer at all with the pollen or anything else outdoors. He made me smile and laugh; and I realised that I didn’t do these things very much in my own company. It was a shame I was going to have to give him up.
Lauren: Can I blame Warren Ellis’s meat, then? No? hrm. I think I’ll blame YOU for introducing the idea that sometimes Tarepanda totally does look like a penis. The panda and I were innocent before we met you, Adam. Are all communists so Freudian all the time?
The moving waters at their priestlike task
The government advise us regarding many things. This is often called “the nanny state” by those that object to being advised. Do I object? Not really. Public health is a public cost. I find it sad the government feel they have to advise us to drink less, eat fruit and vegetables, and exercise more. You can even stand in the urinal in a British pub and see an advert from the government asking men not to rape women. What is that all about?
And can we please talk about the versatility of this fabulous food? You can cook it down to a velvety consistency as I’ve done here, creating a creamy, yellow polenta pillow for bright spring veggies to lie on. It’s also delicious with saucier dishes, like tomato-based stews, and of course the traditional meat-centric mains. Or you can cook it with less liquid, spread on to a large tray, slice it and bake or fry it. What?! Consider my mind blown. I am looking forward to experimenting with spreading it ultra-thin and using it as a wrap, or flatbread. And making cookies and cakes. And crackers. Is this old news? Probably. Thanks for continuing to indulge me, even if I am a bit slow on the uptake.
Keep walking.
I absolutely loved J2150, but I do have some tips for those of you first starting out in the course:
This is where the human male often comes unstuck. His natural instinct is to give a woman what a female gorilla wants and leave it at that. The problem is that most women need to be in the right frame of mind before they are ready to play the part of Mrs Gorilla. And getting them into a suitable mental state requires patience, attentiveness and the ability to express an apt sentiment at the correct moment. It follows that men who have these skills are highly prized – and often adored – by the gentler sex. The most famous historical example is probably Casanova, but unfortunately we have no record of what the great Chevalier actually said to his paramours. The man whose technique I admire the most is Butch Cassidy, as played by the smooth-talking Paul Newman.
*“Pretty Paper”
“Whats Hood”
Mr Evans has not signed the application, but it does state that notice has been served on his solicitor, Paul Rich of Griffiths Ings Solicitors.
Oh yeah...this soap is just regular cold process whereas the ones in the oven are CPOP.
Then on Tuesday(yesterday) Lee had an appointment to have his yearly ultrasound of his liver, bladder and kidneys. Normally I would go back if he needed help transferring from his wheelchair to the examining table. But with my arm in a sling, I sat this one out. When he came out of the room he had marks over and to the side of his right eye. It seems Lee lost his balance so he fell against the table and hit the metal trim. Lee said he hit it so hard he saw stars. He said he thought he was going to pass out. This morning he has one heck of a shiner! He was getting help but they didn't know to wait and threw Lee off balance. Good news, he'll live! hehe We talked and realized that this new facility are not used to Quadriplegics like him. From now on no matter what I will be with him to make sure he has safe transfers. Most of all we can laugh about it and he's OK! Woo Hoo! :0)
There is a handful of things, ideas, people that make me happy, but it seems like the idea of happiness always fades does it not? Whether it seems like a cop-out or not, my pets always make me happy. They’re so unconditional, with the exception of my parrot, he can be a hateful little prick. Though, to his credit, he does warm up my heart when I’m uncovering his cage in the morning, and in his pitiful little bird voice he says Hello. I know he’s probably not actually saying hello to me, but in my groggy state, I like to think so.
Microsoft office Informal: Steps to make a company card within ninety secs (video)
Anti-Semitism making a comeback in Europe Olmert Was A Big Admirer Of Syria Back in 2007 HUH? Rihanna Glamorizes Muslim Niqab/Burka on SNL – VIDEO Hey, Another “Peaceful Muslim” Underwear Bomb Plot: Would’ve Evaded TSA Security Theater Your mileage may vary Iraq Frees Hezbollah Terrorist Accused of Killing US Soldier Overnight music video Netanyahu’s dirty trick or Netanyahu’s brilliant move? French Jews interested in aliyah Jerusalem school raises the PLO flag
People who wish to enter will have to answer in full the following question:
Thanks again for sticking with me!
“MOM! It was on the note we left you.” The note we left on the kitchen table, which, if she hadn’t left the bedroom again today, she wouldn’t have seen yet. “Dave brought me to City Park, and we had a picnic, and it was going great, and then he said he was gonna go get some more sodas, but I had this weird feeling, and I didn’t want him to go, but he did anyway, and that was like five hours ago. ” I paused to sniffle. “Now I’m here at the 7-Eleven looking for him, but he’s not here, and I don’t think he ever came here, and now I don’t know where he is, or what I’m supposed to d-d–dooooo.”
However, when pressed by reporters, MS Gillard was unable to elaborate on what she actually meant.
Happy New Year to everyone!
In Phoenix, Tony and I tried to get on two different flights in the morning but ended up on the 3pm flight. After trying for the second flight, I wanted to just get a hotel and fly home the next day but Tony wanted to try one more. Anne, the gate agent, was great. She got us listed for each flight and felt so bad for us that she asked her boss to work the 3pm flight just to see if we got on board. One stand-by passenger was trying for the same flights as us and gave us two complimentary USAirways Club Lounge cards. We enjoyed drinks, snacks, and comfortable chairs while passing the time. The internet connection was much faster in the room too.
He said 13 years from there, bigamy is no longer outlawed on 3D earth, where the population is down to one billion people with 70% all women.
We will wear our snowsuit today,
Inasmuch as America was not the massive welfare state operating as a magnet for malingerers, frauds and cheats that it is today, it’s amazing the drafters even considered the amendment’s effect on the children of aliens.
2 tablespoons raisins
Born July 26, 1955, and one of Britain’s leading jump trainers, Philip Hobbs first took out a training licence with only nine horses. His first runner, North Yard at Exeter in August, 1985, was a winner and there has been no looking back. He is based at Sandhill near Minehead, Somerset. He tasted big-race success as early as 1986/87 when Bonanza Boy was one of the season’s top novice hurdlers. Putting behind him the disappointment of losing that horse to Martin Pipe, he has gone on to take other important prizes with horses such as Joint Sovereignty (1989 Paddy Power Gold Cup), Moody Man (1990 Imperial Cup and County Hurdle), Dreams End (1994 Swinton Hurdle), Dr Leunt (1999 Racing Post Chase), What’s Up Boys (2001 Hennessy Gold Cup, 2nd 2002 Grand National), Flagship Uberalles (2001 Tingle Creek Chase and 2002 Queen Mother Champion Chase), Gunther McBride (2002 Racing Post Chase), Rooster Booster (2003 Champion Hurdle), One Knight (2003 Royal & Sun Alliance Chase), Monkerhostin (2004 Coral Cup, 2004 Boylesports.com Gold Cup, 2008 bet365
My project has made me realize that sometimes it is hard to remember or stay committed, but once you get in the habit, it’s like second nature. I also learned that certain sustainable practices don’t fit everyone the same way. What works well for one, but not be fitting for another. Throughout this process I have made incremental changes I never thought I would make. I have learned that it is actually pretty easy to be sustainable and it saves you money. I have feel better about what I buy and the impact I am having on the environment.
Most times in a customer service situation, if a customer is rude to you, you have to be nice back. It's the nature of the business. Working in a restaurant, I constantly have to bite my tongue and have a completely different conversation with a rude customer than the one I have in my head. That didn't seem to be the case in a strip club. If a customer was rude to me, I was always rude right back to them. I refused to take any of their crap. Management always backed us up too. I guess they figured with all of the crap we already had to put up with all of the sleazy dudes trying to pull one over, if someone got postal on us, management had no problems yelling at them as they kicked their rude ass out.
I’ve got 3 things on my mind. In no particular order. I want a pair of jeans that are apparently impossible to find. I don’t feel… good. And I REALLY want a British accent.
Motors Airport US
But your reasons were not mine, were not mine
Cookies are one of my family favorite tea time snacks. They are quick to make so does this Eggless Nutella Cookies. It is an easy recipe and does not require chilling. The tasty combination of cookies dough with delicious nutella make them a yummy snack any time of the day.
Nyimbi Odero built the registration software using a Linux operating system. Since Linux OS’s are released under open source licenses, Nyimbi was able to develop the software without the huge expense of licensing fees for every computer running the software. Al Jazeera estimates that this move saved Nigeria hundereds of millions of Naira. Overall, the combined savings from developing the software in country and having it run on Linux is estimated at more than USD$100 million.
3) favorite spooky novel?
Two asides--
New York: February 22, 1944
In fact, the giveaway is in the title of the report, which spells out its remit: "A Review of the Effectiveness of Governance and Financial Management Within the All Wales Ethnic Minority Alliance (AWEMA)". So it's all about AWEMA, and no one else is to blame. And, anyway, we've known for years there was no effective governance or financial management at AWEMA, so why bother telling us what we already
Wines for the evening were offered by Carlo Nerozzi, the architect from Lago di Garda who decided to leave architecture to others and to dedicate his life to his splendid wines of Le Vigne di San Pietro. Thank you, Carlo!
In college, I took a one-semester basic education course because I couldn’t think of any other elective to take. Seriously, it was an accident. But I managed to ace (A+) the course and my teacher then whispered to me that I was meant to be a great teacher. Again, I never made much of this prophecy. I wanted to join a non-governmental organization, for all that mattered.
I ordered my favorite hazelnut machiato. Last time I had an espresso was either in Gaia Ristorante (sheung wan) or Kenon Cafe (wan chai) a year ago. The espresso in Kenon was nice. I remembered myself indulged into the tiny cup of espresso. When I think of it I should go back to Kenon and visit them when i’m free, support the Italian!!
Me: THOSE BOOKS ARE GENIUS!!!!! MY BOOK WILL BE A DISASTER UNLESS I MAKE IT JUST LIKE IT!
It’s commonly accepted that the First Dark Age of Rock resulted from the following factors: Little Richard found Jesus, Elvis got drafted, The Killer married his 13-year-old cousin, Buddy crashed, Chuck violated the Mann Act, Eddie Cochran crashed. When we look at the Billboard Number One singles from 1960-61, it appears that the rot has set in: Teen Angel, Theme From A Summer Place, Wonderland By Night, a little Lawrence Welk. But see who else is here: Everly Brothers, The Drifters, Ray Charles, Maurice Williams, The Shirelles, Del Shannon, Ernie K-Doe, plus Orbison, Gary U.S. Bonds, Bobby Lewis, Dion, The Marvelettes. Not too shabby, all considered. 1962 is almost as good: Joey Dee, Gene Chandler, Bruce Channel, Little Eva, Ray Charles again, The Four Seasons, Crystals, Tornados. OK, so Bobby Vinton, Connie Francis, and Neil Sedaka are also in there, but there’ve been worse horrors inflicted by the record-buying public. 1963: Steve Lawrence (who I like), The Rooftop Singers, Bobby Vinton (again), and The Singing Nun on the one hand—The Four Seasons (right on), Ruby and The Romantics, The Essex, Chiffons, Jimmy Soul, Lesley Gore, The Tymes, Stevie Wonder, Jan & Dean, The Fireballs with Jimmy Gilmer, and The Angels on the other.
Left Unity has other ideas. We think taxpayers money should be spent on the creation of renewable industries and essential services like health, education, public transport and the like.
Goodness...so many things come to mind!!
Paper: Pool Party, Lucky Limeade, Sahara Sand, Whisper White
So i think with my already starling cradletials as a poet u can see u shood put my poem on yur blogg and then u can say you are not a log-taking sissyboy cause see, youv reprasented men and boys of homosexuals too so you support tru eqalitee and ar not just ecspoating lesbiand bcause ur some perv who thinks lesbians are HOTTT. tho i mean they are hot & ive trid a few lesbian things too because i dont judge here ill send u som pictures too!!! hehehe hey i like u does eric holder red thes blog cause maybe we shuld meet even eff im a bet young and i hurd hes 2 beezy triing 2 hav sum conversation that doesnt make sense to even bother with stoping terrarists and perverts.
The weather today was perfect: cool, yet sunny this morning; warming up as the morning wore on, but with great weather and views from the top of LeConte. One of the first interesting places on the trail is Arch Rock which is exactly what it sounds like. The trail goes up a stone stairway under the arch.
Until then my favourite people... have a great week!
It was nice to hear from many of you, since semi-returning from a blogging break. Writing less frequently- but still writing, is definitely a better fit for our family schedule.
...with that fridge I mentioned in yesterday's post.
Spirit In The Night 7:21
Thank you for your wonderful sponsorship!
The roll call included competitors from: The Royal Navy, Royal Engineers, Army Medical Services, Army Technical Foundation College (Winchester), Royal Air Force, The Belgian Reserve Forces, The French Reserve Forces, South Alberta Light Horse (Royal Canadian Armoured Corps), The King's Troop RHA, Royal Logistic Corps, Military Intelligence, Cadet Forces, The Dutch Royal Guards Forces, The President's Bodyguard (India), and The Light Cavalry HAC.
If the child reacts well and enjoys the experiences, and if all the above conditions are met, the child is probably ready to attend a sleep-away camp.
This would make a great dessert all throughout the holiday season, so if you're looking for a beautiful way to end a meal, give this recipe by the esteemed Jacques Pépin a try. It's tasty and light, so you'll be able to polish off the bowl of chocolates afterwards.
out of the textile mill, son. You're going to do better than
But back to the article. I was excited to know that someone was interested in sharing unschooling with such a wide audience in Quebec, but also rather leery, considering how badly slanted media pieces have been in the past, when talking about unschooling. We (my mother and I, since the interview request was for me and any/all of my family members if they were interested) came very close to turning down the interview request. But I discussed it a bunch with my family, since really it would be putting a spotlight on all of us, no matter which one of us was being interviewed, talked a bit to Wendy, who'd already been interviewed over phone with the reporter, and her positive experience talking to the journalist in question was enough to finalize our decision.
Tyler Perry should bow down to the North Philadelphia community and especially the Pearl at Avenue North (right above the Foot Locker that nobody knows about). Every time one of his usually terrible movies premiere, the theater dedicates at least three screens to it and black residents and students flock to it. Just Perry’s name is so popular that on opening night of one of his films, one would think the swarm of African Americans surrounding the Pearl is a Trayvon Martin or Obama reelection rally but no- it’s jus the premiere of a Madea’s Big Happy Family. It’s like before the movie comes out, every black person in the community and at Temple makes a sort-of pact with one another to see the film- I’m still waiting on becoming part of this Perry Pact.
This weekend we had a Christening for a friends son. In the upcoming weeks there are more showers/christenings abound. Next weekend is a *surprise* shower for my BFF and I truly can't wait to celebrate with her!
The setting sun still casts the shadows of the hill on the road, I still sense the passing of feet both human and animal down these paths and slopes. I see my shadow on the path, then without warning I am face to face with the bull that I have forgotten is in this field. A fence separates us. But I am scared. He is huge. A wall of a creature, clearly very old, but so huge. His head and shoulders are brutally, squarely, massive. His breath blows in snorts from his nose, his eyes looks straight at mine. His are cool blue, unmoving. He shifts a little but is neither angry nor scared. He just occupies his space in the world. I am six feet tall, he looks seven feet. But he is three feet wide. His body steams, the muscle and fat are heavy, as is his very obvious cock, yet he holds himself with a holy grace, a pride and a self knowledge. He is gnarled and old, perhaps coming to the end of his life, yet this is certainly still his field, he holds my eyes with his and watches me as I pass by. I'm fully aware that he is a creature worthy of respect, domesticated yet wild. A little like me, I suppose.
7. Pregones Zulianos (3:00)
Rissad dug a hand into his pocket and drew out what looked like a bundle of golden rods, linked by intricate tooling in some darker metal at both ends. It looked like-
Nothing in the world will actually change.
Ah, 24 hours of my favorite Holiday Cheer, drinks with Family and Old Friends, eating until you feel like vomiting-and then eating more-It must be Christmas again.
Being alone in the dark scares me. (not scared of death but turning into something evil) ;(
"Your sign out front says 'Hiring. Now Accepting Resumes.'"
“And that is what worries me about you whitey.” Piper sighed, got up from his chair and retrieved a pack of cigarettes off the counter. Lighting one, he offered Marley another. Marley politely refused it.
The Foreword to Clark’s World Wide Endeavor includes this remark on conversion by Rev. Theodore L. Cuyler, D.D., Pastor, Lafayette Avenue Presbyterian Church, Brooklyn, New York:
"Easy to use" beats "user-friendly"
Internet infrastructures are on the verge of allowing an individual to download data sets equivalent to the entire Library of Congress in mere seconds. Nanotechnology will be developing swiftly over the next decade or two, which could carry everything from significantly increased life-expectancy to paints and dyes that will allow us to completely change the color schemes of our cars and clothes nearly as quickly as the urge strikes us to. Today’s youth are learning to multi-task practically from the cradle, mastering modern modes of electronic communication as soon as their parents will let them. Textbooks will soon drown in a rising tide of e-readers that expose users to unprecedented amounts of information, and interpersonal communication will easily take place anywhere and any time.
Yes, the paradox with which I continue to struggle as an adopted twin is this: I have spent my entire life denying biology, telling myself and others that it doesn’t matter, that my family is my family no matter what our genes reveal, or don’t reveal, on top of our skin or under it. For me, family transcends biology. I still believe that. Family transcends biology, and so do I. What I have done, what I have become, what I will do: I will myself free from the tethers of DNA. Yet, behind my confidence, my identity, my sure sense of self, is my twin, my biological other. Behind me, with me, in me, is my blood twin. Here I am, still trying to rid myself of this notion of biology, while clinging to it as if it is my lifeline, as if, without it, I would surely sink.
The premise for 16 club was to pick 16 records that we were buzzing off at a particular time. It started off as a way to exchange music, but soon just became an excuse to drink Ting, reminisce about mid 90′s football and listen to two-step. Inspired by a combination of our lucky numbers, 16 club unearthed some weird and wonderful gems, some well known, some probably never heard by anyone else. In the coming weeks we’ll start to post our archived compilations, but in the mean time, realising we hadn’t made a 16 in a while, we decided to collaborate on a selection of tunes that we’re in love with at the moment, and so in no particular order, we present to you this months 16:-
Maybe some of you remember author Rosalie Warren kindly appearing as an interviewee on this blog last year. At the time she spoke about how Phoenix Yard Books had accepted her novel for girls aged eleven upwards.
Unlike her placid companion M57, F3 was in full gulo mode from the moment she heard us approach. That indescribable, spine-tingling growl rumbled up from the trap before we even lifted the lid. When we knelt down to peer into the trap, she paced and growled, rushing the opening and our flashlights, drool trailing from her bared teeth. She was smaller than M57, but about ten times as ferocious. She strode between the back wall of the trap and the entrance, lunged, bit the flashlight (three dents; paint scraped clean off), paced to the back wall, and began tearing a piece of bait to shreds, keeping an eye on us as if to make sure we witnessed this demonstration of her ability to demolish anything she chose. In 2007, F3 chewed her way out of a log box trap through six inches of solid wood. We took the point, and lowered the lid to prepare the drugs.
Either way I had to keep him quarantined, and had to miss church and the Christmas concert and am just praying that the littlest one doesn't get it...or anyone else, especially with Christmas around the corner and lots of visiting to be done!!
the futility of desire unfulfilled by her chilling indifference
Carsten Lizard-Schulz: vocals
Anwaar: Did what?
Money is given by the department of Culture, Media and Sports to Ofcom, to delegate to Community Radio Stations around the UK. The idea is that the government recognise the difficulties in raising money to cover ‘core costs’ that come with operating stations of this nature.
I've said here before that it's important to state your hero/ine’s outer desire aloud - either the character saying it or someone close to them (or better yet, in opposition to them) stating it for them.
It's the Loreal Paris Super Liner.
I’ve said it before and I’ll say it again – the damn pills are a curse and a blessing. It’s like what they say on ‘Once Apon A Time’… ‘magic has it’s price, deary’
Have you forgotten yet?...
Harry had a hard day at the office and needed to unwind with a kiddie cocktail. He was horrified, by the way, when he discovered this drink was made with 7-Up. "Soda?" he sputtered wiping his tongue. "Do you want me to get cavities?" He totally judged us for ordering it. (Jack abandoned his after scrubbing the inside of his mouth with a napkin because it was spicy)
Still, the potential for problems is widespread. Solar storms have three ways they can disrupt technology on Earth: with magnetic, radio and radiation emissions. This is an unusual situation, when all three types of solar storm disruptions are likely to be strong, Kunches said. That makes it the strongest overall since December 2006.
For the Lord our God is able
-Towels and washcloths
You can have your own news aggregated through Twitter. There are too many to mention here but they all have optional extra’s and this is why people are paying for access. Once they get a taste they never look back.
You panic and wander about with check-lists of things to reassure yourself that you have indeed actually logged some miles and followed a training plan (of sorts) so that you don’t just burst into an emotional wreck and have to be sent home come race day. It’s too late to walk away now. You’ve been yakking on about this and harassing people to sponsor you for months on end, busting your derriére to fit in training runs and hold down a full-time job at the same time. Friends have had to sit on the back-burner. Special occasions are a distant memory if you have chosen to forgo imbibing alcohol whilst training. Your social life has definitely suffered, your work colleagues appear to go blank whenever you update them about ‘how your training is going’, and what gels/clothing/shoes/running style you personally prefer to use, to the splits you are currently running. They do not understand.
She's the one that keeps the dream alive
But I gave buns to the elephant
3.Score each piece in 1/2 inch increments. (1/2, 1, 1 1/2, 2, 2 1/2, 3, 3 1/2, 4 inches)
My point is this: we never had what I’m advocating. When I put up free market capitalism against another system, other systems just fall short on individual liberty! Progress for free markets was in favor of what I espouse up until the period where monopoly capitalism and trusts began to take hold. This is where things took a turn for the worst. Government was called upon to rectify situations where it shouldn’t have. The markets should have let these monopolies fail. From this point, welfare capitalism took hold and we have not been the same sense. State capitalism, corporatism, and financialization are the result. . .I agree with Marx on the critiques of these systems but his solution I do not.
"Returning now to the history of the firm—in 1822 high import duties were imposed by the Russian Government upon English ales, and this fact led for a time to the almost total suspension of the trade which Messrs. Allsopp and Son had for so long carried on with Russia. The results were not, however, altogether disastrous, for the Burton firm now saw the necessity of pushing their home trade, and the ales which had hitherto been better known in St. Petersburg than in London came into considerable demand in the southern portions of this country.
the deepest half of my pre- post-Christian heart.
He said he was expropriating the company because it had failed to invest sufficiently in Bolivia.
leaves - joy die
The city is divided by the river Thames, which meanders through central London, splitting it into northern and southern halves. The central area and the most important sights, theatres and restaurants are within the Underground’s Circle Line on the north bank of the river.
The second half, which is where the great teaser is extracted from, to a certain extent rehashes those parts of the story inspired by, and to be fair plainly acknowledged in its title, from Tom Godwin’s widely anthologised classic science fiction story of the same name. First published in 1954 and reprinted frequently ever since, it is also about the tough decisions made on a spaceship with regards to ejecting cargo to ensure the survival of the maximum number of people where air is in short supply. The main set-piece in the play sees Steven sticking his hand out into the vacuum of space (apparently without it freezing and falling off …) to help take part in what can best be described as a game of six dimensional billiards to try to save the TARDIS and those stranded on the satellite and the escape module as the air supply starts to really run out. This part of the story is well in keeping with the educational ethos of the Hartnell era as we got lengthy explanations of the laws of physics in space, though this does work pretty well in fact.
Once there was a HOT BIRD, now there is a HOT BIRD, as always the city is a fertile wardrobe waiting to be tried on and turned out.
neglect that caused her to lose most of her sight
When your icon of the enemy is complete
A challenge to Heather Munro of London Probation Trust:
We stopped for lunch in a place called Woomera. There aren't many places to stop anymore. I think we came through only 2 places that could be considered habited or maybe one was just a petrol station/ bar in the 300km we drove today. Woomera is a military town, I didn't like it much. It was just full of displays of missiles and the park where we ate our preprepared sandwiches was supposedly a bird sanctuary. Just poor sad parrots in small cages. Not so nice.
Last year I had a ton of crabgrass so right now in my area I have GOT to get the Crabgrass preventer on now or I'll be in the same boat I was last year. I'm definitely not interested in the same lawn as last year!
Line your muffin pan or grease very well. Wash and dry your blueberries and then toss them in a small bowl with your extra flour, set aside. Mash your bananas in another small bowl and set aside. In a large bowl combine brown sugar and oil, whisking or mixing quickly until light in texture. Add buttermilk, egg, and vanilla whisking until uniform. Either combine in a separate bowl all the dry ingredients or use a mesh bowl strainer to sift over the wet mix, stirring slowly using a folding form, careful to only mix until combined. Slowly fold in the bananas and blueberries, careful again not to over stir.
Nearly 80 percent of disease in developing countries is linked to bad water and sanitation. Now a scientist at Michigan Technological University has developed a simple, cheap way to make water safe to drink, even if it’s muddy.
That last command was his own, added each time.
We also have weeds in our gardens, and in our yard--actually, all over our yard.
I knew whom he meant. "They were not men, although they were once men and still resemble men. They were zooanthrops, a word that indicates those beasts that are of human shape. Do you understand what I am saying?"
I've learned to never stop learning. The world is filled with surprises and you never know what might come your way next. There is always something to be learned from every experience, good or bad.
As JCK volleyed this out of her overworking mouth, she realized that she was inciting what every parent in the trenches knows...that once you give weight and issue to the word the child is not supposed to say...they will do the very thing you wish them not to do. They. Will. Say. It. Again and again.
3) Make 5 new connections daily.
I didn't want to cover the robot in the background of the paper, so I cut out my little guy and attached him with dimensionals. Because this is going to a boy, I had to keep the embellishments simple- a bit of cool stitching, silver brads and a die cut greeting - definitely NO ribbon!
After that, we went by auto rickshaw in search of shops. Actually, we're not great shoppers, me and Wink. Now we are back at the hotel, have put our feet up for a bit and are heading down to meet Maja and Marina for lunch.
Birth Matters is a profoundly encouraging book arguing a way forward for reconciling our modern lives with the act of birth. At its core, Birth Matters recognises that birthing is a feminist issue. In interviewing Ina May Gaskin I asked her all the difficult questions that had been bubbling around in my head since my own birth experiences and I am delighted to say that she was very generous, and not unexpectedly, quite fearless in taking my questions on…
Where to start? When in doubt, I usually turn to my BFF, J.K. Rowling, for wisdom. People really seemed to like her rags-to-riches story, the whole struggling-single-mum-on-welfare-makes-good angle. So with that in mind, I’m going to tell you something—something that not a lot of people know about me.
PS Do you wonder where I have the time to blog, create, and take photos amidst being a new mom?! I wonder too....lol. Actually, alot of it is due in part to my wonderful husband and a sleepy infant :)
Then mums get up, wash their red eyes, put a smile on their faces and said "yes my munckin" from the heart the way only a mum can.
Guess what your single of the weekend is?
Also got word this week that I already have a semi-pro football game assigned to me as referee for March 17, right after we get home. I have a good crew for the game so it should be fun.
The colors of the Happy Camper collection will coordinate nicely with your outdoor photos, and the themes on the papers and embellishments highlight all your camping experiences; campfire stories, S'more fixin's, pitching the tent, snuggling in your sleeping bag, or just enjoying your spot in nature. My personal favorite is the hexagon shape paper with the flies and mosquitoes! Along with the patterned paper, there are two coordinating sticker and die-cut sheets.
Soak the chunks over night ..In the morning squeeze the water and add hot water into it ..Keep it for 15 minutes and drain the water and squeeze..Again do the same for 3-4 times ..We are doing to remove the smell ..I don`t like soya ..But if u do these much time of soaking and squeezing then the chilly soya will taste too good….
I'm still stumbling
I made my first ‘sun tea’. In the Arizona heat, keeping irriguous is a constant challenge and water gets boring, so iced tea is a nice alternative. I will be sipping something all day long.
None of the vows worried the groom, who works with Carina for his parents Lisa Umphenour and Gene Riley at Specialty Auto Parts, the family’s salvage yard in St. Johns County.
And then they came for the conservative media, And I didn’t speak up because I wasn’t a member of the conservative media;
A charismatic church was brought before a judge on charges of illegally providing shelter for the homeless, as they were not zoned to do something like this. Respectfully, the leader of the church said, “Thank you for the information we will go back to our church and pray about it.” When the leader went back to the judge and prosecutors his answer was, “We understand the issues you have with the legality of what we’re doing. We will stop sheltering the homeless. Instead, we will have a worship service beginning at 7pm and after about an hour we will enter into a time of silent meditation until 10am.”
Lightfoot’s tired of loafing around as the assistant manager of an Ohio bakery. So when her Aunt Lucy and Uncle Ben open a bakery in Savannah’s quaint downtown district and ask Katie to join them, she enthusiastically agrees.
We started with a round of Fresh Oyster on the 1/2 Shell ($14 for half dozen) - for the tasting we got both kinds of oysters: Hama Hama from Washington (the bigger ones shown on left in the photo) and Fanny Bay from British Columbia. These were not the best oysters I've ever had (Monterey fisherman's wharf restaurants win on that one) but they went fast - there was nothing but empty shells left 60 seconds after they hit the table.
A lot of books start off telling you how to build XML documents in memory. I think this is a big waste of time and server resources for any type of records format. It’s almost always better to bake the files, and I have no need to do create files in memory.
· Travel distance under ‘Izzat Scheme’ to increase from 100 kms to 150 kms.
To recap our little pep talk for the week regarding the seeking of providing and/or of advice…It comes down to one of life’s most basic dicta “You are more likely to get what you want if you ask for it.” Shocking isn’t it?!?
Moving the furniture was damn near impossible, and even though I live with my brother and nephew and niece, I wouldn't think of asking for help! (see a trend here?) There was no place to put anything in my living room, so I moved things mostly filled, rather than unloading everything. Those Ikea shelves weigh a ton when loaded and don't like to be moved! And those old tables, well they are great, cause the tops are enameled and can be scraped with a razor blade. But the legs are all wobbly and the leaves want to fall off, and the floor is way crooked! So I shimmied and shoved and grunted and groaned till they were in place, then I took Tylenol and slept in the recliner till my knees wanted to work again.
He is a man of few words and his strengths to keep our family standing through all tribulations and achievements is amazing. He might not be there around as a life saver but at the end, he always makes everything right if not perfect. He is a soldier in his own way and I admire him a great deal, I have respect for him as my dad and elder too.
Princess: I’m going to escape through a secret passage way! And then I will get help from “the outside.” Also, I have never learned from movies that you should never announce your plans to people.
-pregnancy
Characters are… blah. The girls are pretty standard for the most part the teacher is a total jerk. I mean, he remembers and identifies a middle school-aged girl by her undergarment and then wonders what he did wrong. Not a quality human being there.
I admit that I slept like a log last night...in the middle of my bed, with no accidental headbutts, no toes in my nose. She woke up early, at the crack of dawn, and came running down the hall. She jumped in my bed, nursed, and we cuddled for about 45 minutes before getting up to start our day.
I love, love, love birthdays!
"Pitcher plants are carnivorous plants whose prey-trapping mechanism features a deep cavity filled with liquid known as a pitfall trap. Foraging, flying or crawling insects such as flies are attracted to the cavity formed by the cupped leaf, often by visual lures such as anthocyanin pigments, and nectar bribes. The sides of the pitcher are slippery and may be grooved in such a way so as to ensure that the insects cannot climb out. They drown the insect, and the body of it is gradually dissolved."
I’ve been separated from the world of sin, death and destruction unto the glory – life I’m experiencing the glorious liberty of the sons of God! I rejoice today and every day of my life, knowing that I’ve been accepted in the beloved and chosen of God unto a life of victory and supernatural prosperity in Jesus Christ Name Amen!
I poked and prodded my stomach. I rolled from my left side to my right.
Step 8 - Take 1 end of the elastic and thread it back through one of the beads so that your two ends of elastic come out of the opposite sides of same bead - but keep the knot visible, don't pull it through - yet.
If true, this is very troubling. There is case law indicating that the author retains all rights that have not been explicitly assigned to a publisher (the Tasini case), and a preliminary finding by a judge that says that pre-electronic rights contracts do not give publishers e-book rights simply because the contracts specified book rights (Random House, Inc. v. Rosetta Book LLC). While the issue is by no means resolved (unfortunately, Rosetta Books settled with Random House, and the actual dispute wasn’t litigated, so we don’t know for sure how the case would have turned out), that’s surely enough case law to indicate that for out-of-print works, the author is likely to be the rightsholder that HathiTrust (and projects like it) should be looking for.
In order to grow into the Christ-likeness the Father intends for us, we must pray as Christ prayed, we must walk as He walked, we must be empowered by the Holy Spirit as He was empowered and we must fulfill the Father’s will as He fulfilled the Father’s will to bring forth the Glory of His Kingdom here on this Earth. In effect we are here to continue Jesus’ ministry in this world! This is beyond anything our hapless humanity can accomplish – only the Holy Spirit working in us and through us can transform us and empower us to bring us to this point. We are new creation in HIM, but the Holy Spirit will not activate our new self without our yielding totally to the will of the Father.
“We have not received any instructions to mobilize volunteers for the election. Mr Desmond Choo has been working hard on the ground in Hougang for more than a year. It doesn’t make sense to parachute an ‘outsider’ into Hougang in the last minute,” he added.
The Limited it 7500 yen and the Regular is 5500. I think it’s worth paying the extra 2000 because you get alot more for your money than just a concert. I saw a Japanese TV show where a presenter went to watch it and they had a few spoilers, and it looked awwwwesoooome! They have these skates that change colours, it’s awesome.
Eternal joy and peace await those who grow in the grace of generosity that flows from compassionate hearts. Doctrine and Covenants 163:9
had to fuck up my flow
I learned from this experience to never be predictable in some situations. I also have become extremely jumpy and I blame a lot of it on this situation and also from a lot of break-ins or attempted break-ins to the homes I lived in as a kid. I have many weapons by my bed and my husband is scared to come into the house unannounced.
flaunting of democracy by Laurent Gbagbo in Côte d'Ivoire.
Vegetable oil or olive oil, 2 table spoons
What happens if she learns the truth?…
As the date of the burial got closer, as we expected, it saddened us even more because we knew this would be the final “chapter” of Adam’s earthly life.
The next part is a blur. I was sat on the toilet and felt this incredible urge to push. I got off the toilet and squatted by the sink, moaning and panting, trying desperately not to have this baby. My husband was putting the futon mattress down on the floor in the bedroom (nothing like being prepared in case of a quick labour!), my Mum was next to me saying "don't push, don't push", I put my hand down and I could feel the top of the baby's head poking out.
However, as time has gone on and Hipstercrite has expanded, the inevitable has happened. I want to move to a more professional and sleeker looking blogging platform. People have been telling me to make the move over to Wordpress and I'm about 90% ok with the idea of making that transition. So what 10% is holding me back? Money, alienating my wonderful followers, and the fear of the unknown.
After lunch, we headed back to the hotel to finally check in. We are staying at the Hotel Mundial located right in the center of Lisbon. The hotel opened up in 1958 and has been remodeled several times since them. The rooms are way more spacious than what I imagined and are actually very nice. Here is view when you first walk in.
Over the course of the next three days, a ski hill will emerge in the Live! Block descending from the skywalk to the Live! Stage standing over a story and half tall, 50 feet wide and 107 feet long. A total of 150 pre-registered local and national riders will compete in the event and 16 will be named to the “Scion 16” for an opportunity to team up with one of 16 professional riders for the finals competition. A large crowd is anticipated for the finale as it is the biggest snowboarding event to take place in the Midwest.
Steve Wright is Director of Grameen Foundation’s Social Performance Management Center. He is a keynote speaker for the upcoming SOCAP11 conference. This is the first of a series of blog posts focusing on the intersection of money and meaning. We’ve excerpted a section of the post below, with a link to the full post afterwards.
I prefers to write and night it’s so quiet and peaceful
First, it annoys me when people misspell "judgmental." There's only one "e" in that word, people.
Why: Because the beer is awesome, and we want to share it with you.
I’m saying it that way because of my time schedule. Every day goes like this: wake up a few hours before training, hang around the apartment. Train. Shower (maybe). Go out and do things (ride bikes or walk, for a few hours). Dinner. Sleep.
At about noon today, as the family Thomassen was driving through the wilds and arid scrubland between San Angelo and Austin, Onni wanted Mila and me to entertain her with tales of our childhoods. "What theme?" I asked.
Of course with all the great picks there were some busts as well. Well only talk about two of the more funny or forgetful ones. Care McNown and Rex Grossman. Do I really need to say much more?
This is all a bit of a worry.
I love you for who you are right here and now. But I want to be in your life all the time. I don’t want to be a second thought. I don’t want to be what you do last. i want to be first. Unburry your passion. Unburry the gifts I have given you and trust Me.
It was built using innovative and experimental techniques — but these were deeply flawed, requiring expensive remedies. Many houses had central heating outlets in the ceiling. The fact that heat rises was ignored, so the bedrooms were heated moderately well but not the downstairs rooms. And one can punch a hand through walls because the houses’ metal frames are corroded and the concrete slabs have collapsed.
- The only thing that's ever creeped me out that bad was during the end of 'Twin Peaks', when Bob came creeping through the window. It was totally spinechilling. Then after the show was over, I went upstairs to bed while Brad was still watching TV. About a half hour later I sheepishly rejoined him because I didn't want to be up there by myself and have that image of Bob in my head.
What is Budweiser?
And finally here is my little deck. It has seating for two.
I said, “Yes?”
“In Suspension” – A Poem of Passion
Muslim tradition places the unattractive elements of design on the outside while keeping the luxurious close to home, away from prying eyes. Therefore their gardens have high walls around them so passersby cannot see the beauty within. Only invited guests who are asked inside are privy to the magnificence of the gardens inside.
Karla: Wow! I guess so! Being so busy, do you stick to a daily writing routine, or squeeze it in wherever you can?
I broke on my way home…I called him (I knew he was getting ready to leave for work and would be gone by the time I got home) I told him what was going on, that I could move in with Jo but she needed to know today that I was scared he’d keep talking to Betsy and doing the things he did this week. I told him I just wanted to know if he thought he should change anything about himself. He told me that he had only talked to Betsy that one time and he didn’t even know why I was comparing myself to Betsy. He told me that he didn’t just get an attitude, he only got an attitude when I did. He told me that he was frustrated with the bed situation because I took up too much room and his back killed him after he got off work and he just wanted to be able to go home and relax. What I heard when he said that was, I hate my life right now and I’m taking it out on you. And he also told me that he didn’t think he needed to change anything. I told him that I felt like I needed time to myself, and time to grow up and I couldn’t do that with him.
So, it seems as though I am finally either allowing myself, or maybe just am finally able to be somewhat excited about little Abby. It's a good thing, but scary as heck too.
The Empire State Building, the Grande Dame of New York skyscrapers, has a roof height of around a 100 feet or 30 meters lower. The difference between a skyscraper built during the Great Depression and one built during the 21st Century Depression is around 100 feet and about a century of aesthetics. Where the spire of the Empire State Building is an organic extension of it, the one atop OWTC is awkwardly placed, it's just there making time and filling up the space.
The story line of One Second After will probably not surprise you. The book is in the tradition of Alas Babylon, and as a reader, you will know right away where things in general are headed. So, the real questions are these: How will the main characters hold up under the strain? Will they retain their humanity? What kind of life will they be able to build for themselves?
“In comparison to the Benedictines and the CSB/SJU community, Nienstedt and Archbishops in general are conservative,” Fr. Rene McGraw said.
As I think about that, I am reminded about how these situations felt before I became a parent, like when I was in the Army. As a military leader, I always felt like my leadership was providing a service for my troops, and so I performed my duties and led my teams with a selflessness that was both engaging and effective. I could lead gently or hard, depending on the situation. But I always felt that I had to go out and earn the respect of my troops every day, that I was not ever entitled to it simply based on my rank or position. I had to earn my stripes, every day, through my words and actions.
Because when I am weak, you console me, you pacify me, and you distract me.
Clint Eastwood's excellent Gran Torino features some hard hitting language and important issues of the day, not least of which are race relations in modern America.
A single word-change made this climactic scene pop. And that’s the point of paying attention to vague words like “it” and replacing them with more exacting words. Details make good writing burst into life.
The sequel, Jacob Bear Goes to School is free tomorrow.
My Thailand friend still lives in Thailand, but far away from her hometown, where her job took her. And right at this moment, that job took her for a business trip to the USA.
On a happier note, the other poem that often comes to mind when I’m walking round the garden or feeling exhilarated after a swim in the sea is Dylan Thomas’s ‘The Force That through the Green Fuse Drives the Flower’. Life goes on. This weekend, oblivious to lives being taken or changed, we had a wonderful time catching up with my daughter, Rose, and her partner Si. We walked and swam and simply enjoyed being together in glorious weather. Ma’s feeling rejuvenated too, after her brush with serious injury in December. Yesterday, she phoned to tell me that she’d booked herself up on ‘a computer course for wrinklies’ since she’s itching to buy herself a laptop. And finally, Stepson One and his fiancée, Gill, fly off to Grenada tomorrow to get married. Here’s wishing them every happiness on their wedding day and for their lives together.
We can run around, go up, or tunnel through
2010.09.01 Thailand Pattani 2 0 A Buddhist couple in their 50's are brutally murdered by Jihadi gunmen.
I choose to blog about these two fluencies together because my students are currently working on a project that demonstrates both fluencies. The project is called a Digital Time Capsule. Students are put into teams of three to four students and each team is given a specific time period. For example, team one may have drawn the time period 1950-1959 and team three may have drawn 1990-1999. Using their given time period the team must create a digital time capsule using the iMovie application to illustrate the different aspects and events of the era. To help gather information before building their time capsule the students used the GRAPES+E graphic organizer we have used in class to organize the geographic, religious, accomplishments, political, economic, social structure, and entertainment information of their time period. As a part of their project each team has to create a “social contract” the team must agree to follow so that each team member is held accountable for their part of the project. This idea I used from the project based learning demonstrated by New Tech High that we visited earlier this month. Once the social contracts are turned in and all GRAPES+E information is gathered the teams were allowed to start researching for video clips and images that would represent the information they found in completing their graphic organizer. As a part of research and gathering information at least one team member was to conduct a personal interview with a person that was living in the team’s time period in order to gain first hand knowledge and experience of the era. The final stage of the project requires the students to build their time capsule in iMovie by putting together the images, video clips, and text they have gathered.
Lawyers for the government have argued the historical accounting would cost $12 billion. Exceeding the cost and scope of what Congress has said was acceptable an have asked the three-judge panel of the U.S, Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia to allow the interior Department to continue with its own accounting effort.
I have also learned that running a home business can be stressful, time consuming, and demanding. Those are things I don’t want in my life right now. Over the last month when orders have been light, I was able to plan my days around my kids and be spontaneous with my schedule. I didn’t have inventory to count, product orders to place, paperwork to file, or boxes to pack. And it was nice. My kids will only be young once, and I want to pour myself into them now while they are still teachable and moldable.
I will attempt to read 100 books again. You may find it a challenge to read 30 in the year. That's okay. Challenge yourself. You decide your limit. Set the goal and lets all join together to help you accomplish it!
150(O pious fraud of am'rous charity!)
Over the past few weeks, I have been invigorated and moved by the energy surrounding Occupy Wall Street and its offshoots across the nation. Yet, at the same time I've been faced with the tensions being articulated by so many folks on the Left: how can this energy be connected to and further long-standing organizing work for social and economic justice?
The dispute raises Internet-age questions about the information people make available about themselves online, and how proactive government agencies should be in seeking out that information when it comes to granting taxpayer-funded benefits.
She walks into the doors,
Cookie dough cupcakes made by sweet B
Ghiradelli Gourmet Milk Chocolate Bar: Score! Chocolate is fabulous and free chocolate is even better! Ghiradelli makes my favorite white chocolate-I like it even more than Godiva! Since I’m a white chocolate person, I gave this bar to my husband to try out. He also loves Ghiradelli and said this was a very sweet chocolate bar without being too sweet. Two thumbs up on this one!
and keep us still in grace,
And when you rise and when you fall
9.AUTOCLAVE "I'll Take You Down"
*Hi! I am also a consultant and you can visit my site at http://www.mycmsite.com/sites/marylawrence . If you live in South Florida and want to learn more about Cricut or Creative Memories please contact me! -Mary
I started to read Judge Dredd in the early 1990s and I love the character.
The PUBLISHING SERVICE INDEX for author solutions services is something we have been providing since June 2010. This is the index for April 2012. Please see the separate page link for a list of individual reviews of all service providers.
In a meadow the Elf laughed in a sing song voice he confessed.
As promised, we have drawn a winner for the Echo Park "Country Drive" paper pack. This is one of my favorite paper sets ever - so happy and sweet with all of my favorite colors!!
Confession 1:
This is how thick I layered it on. Now we begin to dry the the frosting with the heat tool. Start from the backside of the cardstock first and when you can see it starting to dry a bit and puff up, finish drying it drm the fron...do not get too close or you will burn your frosting....We're cookin now, huh? Isn't your frosting fluffy!
2) The Visual Learner
Throughout her career, Caroline Munro repeatedly tried to break into the music business. In actual fact, prior to ever getting into modelling or acting and while still at school at the age of 16, she recorded a cover version of Tar and Cement together with Eric Clapton, Ginger Baker and Jack Bruce of Cream and Steve Howes of Yes as backing musicians. For a good while that single has been something of a Holy Grail for Munro Collectors as it was quite difficult to trace and also proved expensive enough due to her now famous fellow musicians involved in it at the start of their own careers but nothing stays obscure for too long these days and it has since found its way to YouTube and elsewhere. It’s a cheerful ditty tune that will keep you humming throughout the day and quite possibly the best song she has ever recorded.
He’s our environment. Our whole being is in him. There’s no need to coax him to show up…he’s there…he was there way before we were…he doesn’t leave. Ever.
I could talk for years about this particular record, but that would just spoil your pleasure. If you’re into conspiracy theories, astronomy and other pick-up lines material, Psycho Social is clearly your cup of tea.
Windham GC, Fenster L, Swan SH, Neutra RR. Use of video display terminals during pregnancy and the risk of spontaneous abortion, low birthweight, or intrauterine growth retardation. Am J Ind Med 1990; 18: 675-688.
4. If you don’t have a blog and want to join in, sign up in the comments here. Later, let us know about your progress by leaving comments on the review link page.
And could her nationality give her an exotic edge in the dating game over Britain’s home-grown lovelies?
Thursday the 15th – Chris Addison @ The New Alexandra Theatre, Birmingham – Although I don’t know what he’s doing here, given that they were meant to be filming a new series of “The Thick Of It” aroundabout now (and, much as I hate to say it, that’s altogether more important).
I mentioned a couple weeks ago that this mother of 2 young boys had found out she had a massive brain tumor. The removed the entire tumor & found out that she has stage 4 brain cancer. Today I found out that her tumor has returned & is aggressive.
Perhaps it was for the best
- The New Blood Orchestra conduit par Ben Foster
The second song litters the ear with a blistering insistent shower of metallic artillery of riffs, picking and spotting the senses like hailstones until a lull leads into a feisty and formidable display of towering riffs and sharp melodic manipulations. As the track paces and slightly intimidates the senses the rhythms of Wood announce fully their strong and inventive prowess, the drummer bringing an adventurous spine to the songs which never breaks lose from his intelligent and skilful control.
The show and its producers are now being called responsible for encouraging racism. By refusing to cast a Black contestant, they are demonstrating a lack of support for non-white and interracial relationships and having a preference of white-only relationships. So far, the creator of the show, Michael Fliess has denied the racist accusations and said that people of color don’t come forward and try out for the show but they are always looking to cast for ethnic diversity.
We were met just inside the door by an agent who verified all the needed paperwork before assigning us to the next line. The time was slow, so another agent was available and we went up to the desk.
Anyway, here - for the final time - are some photos! Bye for now and thanks so much for reading!
Every new sexual experience, when you are not married, puts another ding, another scratch, another scar on who you are. You keep running your car into other people, and then you wonder why no one treats you special. You can’t understand why no one wants to make a major commitment.
But, remember this: football is an entertaining game played by 22 people kicking a ball around a pitch for 90 minutes.
The melodic possibilities of harmonic minor and its modes are explored in fascinating detail here. The songs are less "song-like" than a lot of Dead Can Dance material and function more as melodic adventures over droning backgrounds. I wonder how much of this is improvised, and I wonder how many cues Lisa took from Kind of Blue and how many she took from Indian classical music. That said, shit still sounds medieval as fuck, so blast this Lisa Gerrard album and this youtube video simultaneously and enjoy the best that life has to offer.
Sue - Gifts For Smart Kids and Their Adult Equivalents.
Shire Thamesreach: Tamara
* “J” sound always like the hard “G”.
“There’s no way a white woman would marry a Caucasian after sleeping with black men,” he declared. “When they’ve had black, there’s no going back.”
We started our hike up to the Pinnacle via the Grand Canyon. It’s not really so grand as the one in America, but it is still magnificent in its own way.
MARCH 5 — Attorney General (AG) Abdul Gani Patail want us to believe that he is committed to ensuring that the rule of law is upheld in Bolehland. In his address to members of the Judiciary and the Bar entitled “Opening of the Legal Year 2010”, on 16 Jan., he declared:
Paper: PTI vintage cream, early espresso, crumb cake, My Mind's Eye DP
But, you are still
$10.00/1 – FisherPrice Lil’ Lightning McQueen Ride-on Race Car, Target Coupon
Mass is sung after Terce. Where the rubrics are properly observed six candlesticks are placed on the altar as proper for a greater-double feast. The Mass is proper with the introit Scio cui credidi. The Gloria is sung, a commemoration is sung of St. Peter the Apostle. The Creed is sung and the preface is of the Apostles.
Since the beginning of 2012, the energies have gone from feeling stuck, to feeling like we are in an out-of-control spaceship. This pace is literally taking our breath away.
The Donor support, Julie, is one of the best people I have ever met. Genuinely. She is kind, and compassionate, caring. She is funny, and generous, with a warm heart and a giving soul. I envy her for the job she has, and the life she’s living, the legacy she’s leaving. She gets to travel to India four times a year, and she is facilitating the joy of children to dozens of people. She meets new people all the time, and although she’s away from her family for long periods, and she’s often away from her own little boy, I don’t think she would change a thing.
If that were true then Hyundai sales wouldn’t be burgeoning or would they be the most feared major car company in the U.S. Do you remember when Hyundai’s used to be a joke? Jay Leno said you could double a Hyundai’s value by filling it up with gas. No one’s laughing now as Hyundai’s John Krafcik steered it from joke to contender. It took a risk.
The bottom line is that women in our largest ethnic minority group do not have a good outlook when it comes to breast cancer. And improving the outlook is about more than screening programs and access to medicines. Striking at the heart of a serious disease means a serious look at our entire system of care and asking where treatment for breast cancer and survival of women lie within our values.
As children, many of us entertained fantasies or even goals of being an actor, singer, dancer, artist, or musician. In some cases, we received enough encouragement to develop our abilities in those creative arenas, but somewhere along the way we stopped. This stopping may have been due to circumstances beyond our control or to our own unconscious acts of self-sabotage. Being creative can be scary in a world that seems to value logic over imagination and practicality over dreaming. We can forgive ourselves for shutting down or turning our attention away from our inner artist, but perhaps we can also take steps to reclaim our dreams.
Sharon Horie v the United Kingdom – 31845/10 [2011] ECHR 289. Back at the end of 2009 we reported the Supreme Court case of Secretary of State for Environment, Food and Rural Affairs v Meier and another, which upheld the use of a quia timet injunction – a prospective possession order – against a group of new travellers, preventing them from occupying any land owned by the Forestry Commission in the area. Sharon Horie, one of the new travellers, applied to the European Court of Human Rights. This is the decision on the admissibility of the application.
How else would you do it?
"(Police Chief -AG) Whitehorn fired Willis earlier this month but decided against criminal charges, concluding he could not determine whether it was a case of police brutality."
Got to tell meself something nice though, haven’t I? Need to boost the ego surely? We all need a confidence boost don’t we?
When joining an airline or air taxi, flying passengers around, the airline will carry out checks of your ability as often as they deem necessary, you will always have your Instrument Rating to renew every year however, they will want to ensure that you are up to scratch on your normal and emergency procedures. Most often than not the airlines set these tests every 6 months for the company required checks however the IR is a yearly requirement.
In addition to Shape Shifting Streets, Cleveland has another tradition: multiple streets meeting at intersection like a game of twister. There are several varieties of this head scratching traffic dilemma. First, there is the Residential Stop Sign intersection. 5 or 6 streets all meet at an intersection like spokes on wheel and it’s anybody guess which street is considered a continuation of the one you are currently on because you have to veer left or right to get to any one of them. Then, there is the Turn Left Onto Which Street intersection. You are at a light. There is a sign that shows the left lane turns left only. The middle lane goes straight only and the right lane turns right only. The only problem is there are 4 or 5, not three, streets to choose from after you proceed through the intersection.
The Bible confirms that we are the church.
My favorite plaid treasure is this vintage Pendleton Coat my daughter found....too bad it didn't fit her....NOT!
Since 2009 the New York Yankees have had one prospect that seemingly every team in the league wanted to get their hands on. That prospect was none other than Catcher/DH Jesus Montero who ironically was considered by some of the Yankee’s ownership as the savior of the organization. Montero who is only 22 years old has already shown that he is a monster with a bat in his hand. In only 18 games last season the Phenom had 4 HR’s ,12 RBI’s and a BAA of .328 . In most of these games he played as a DH instead of behind the plate. What the 2011 Yankees had in hitting they lacked in their pitching staff. Because of their poor pitching GM Brian Cashman felt that it was a necessity for the team to add at least 2 more arms to its starting rotation. So on January 14th 2012 in a trade with the Seattle Mariners the Yankees parted ways with their coveted prospect in exchange for a young 23-year-old SP by the name of Michael Pineda. Pineda like Montero had been the prized possession in the Seattle farm system, standing at a towering 6’7 ” Pineda can reach speeds upwards of 99 mph on the radar gun and features a slider that breaks in hard on Left Handed batters. Along with the acquiring of Pineda the team also sign RHP Hiroki Kuroda who spent the 2011 season in LA with the Dodgers. The 36-year-old Kuroda is a native of Japan and has been in the majors for 3 seasons. Kuroda is not a pitcher that will over power hitters like Pineda will but will instead use strategy and movement with his pitches to fool hitters. His numbers weren’t too shabby with a career ERA of 3.45 2011 was not an awful year by any means for Kuroda. With a 13-16 record and an ERA of 3.07 Hiroki should really benefit from the Yankees offense that is much stronger and more reliable than the bats in LA.
Citing the mass upsurge that led to the fall of the Berlin Wall and the more recent popular uprisings in the Middle East and the rest of the world which featured massive use of new technologies, dot com corporations of course ride on this myth in order to cash in. But as Vaidhyanathan points out:
There was a moment, within the familiar steps that parallel both the Anglican and Catholic paths of Communion that Fr. John stopped and simply said, “lift up your voice and thank Jesus for what He has done in your life. Rejoice in it.” Simply put, “holy crap!” It was like a canopy was split from the weight of too much water and it poured out on the entire congregation. I suddenly felt alive in Christ and was ready to skip up to the front to receive Him in a new, refreshing, thankful way. He is alive in me and I will rejoice in that!
Let us in our churches, prayer groups, and personal prayers begin with boldness to explore in depth these new frontiers of prayer for the radical healing of our family bodies, our church bodies, our racial, national, professional bodies.
Violated the strict pursuit policy, for instance by chasing a motorist who fled while getting a traffic ticket.
Within the marketing world, there are a small number of consultancies, mostly in the UK, that deal specifically with brand strategy from a semiotic perspective. Most of their work has to do with qualitative research into the ways consumers interact with brands and how those brands create various systems of meaning. But you don't even have to know what semiotics is to practice it. Most people I know in the marketing world have never heard of it, but they are semioticians...without even knowing it. Marketing, advertising, branding, strategy...pretty much anything an agency can do involves a consideration for how customers are going to interpret messaging, verbal or visual, and working to ensure that interpretation is beneficial.
So I look for the cracks in those stone hearts, as they roll along through life.
Whoever Peter Lorre was.
NAUGHTY INCARNATION #3 (Hey, anyone can do it in numerical order!)
It all comes crashing down, though, two years into the Great Depression, when the bank takes the house and the trains, too. Now, Oscar must move in with his aunt and cousin while his father seeks work out in California.
1. Take pen and mark calendar for the 3rd annual Holiday Cookie Exchange on Sunday. December 12th at 2pm
I can't help..absolutely can't help but reflect on how quickly the years go by. And it wasn't thaaat long ago when new years seemed well paced. I remembered events and non events making the space between two consequitive years. Now..they seem on top of each other. Years whizz by and it is only on the first of each year do we see-- for real-- the years that are passing as by.
Treat- Banana Pudding
01. Incontro (03:54)
In addition to learning information in these books I also use some of these books as decorative accessories in my house. I love that books have a dual purpose. I think that all the Kate Spade books are great on top of my television stand for a couple of reasons because all three of these books are part of a collection and all three have bright-colored covers.
Happy Weekend Everybody!!
I spent the rest of the weekend at the show feeling sorry for myself not winning any of the very nice raffle baskets, filled to the brim with tasty quilting treats, that were raffled off every hour. The basket of all baskets is the second to the last basket raffled on the last day...it is the coveted VENDOR'S BASKET. This is where all the vendors at the show pony up merchandise to stuff a basket with. It's also the basket where people drop in an entire strip of 30 tickets, instead of just one or two.
Life is a process of growth. The urge to add value must at some stage come to fruition. A seedling receives nourishment in its shell and is acted upon as it germinates. Then one day the pressure to burst and grow is too strong and suddenly the seed sprouts and gives itself to the essence of itself and becomes itself.
This, of course, is nuts. It's nutty, conspiratorial, fringe thinking -- it's not birtherism, but it's exactly as crazy as birtherism. Taken to its logical conclusion, it would define just about every president of the past century as a traitor to the Constitution.
I’d like to thank my readers for sharing this last year with me. It’s been an adventure.
On Monday, we visited the plot, despite being a bit worse for wear from a visit to the pub on Sunday. We didn’t stay long but we did finally get something planted, my Jerusalem Artichokes. I only planted two of these tubers as they are prolific growers and I didn’t want to end up with too many come winter. Jerusalem artichokes grow to be about ten foot tall and are a close relative of the sunflower. They are apparently very easy to grow and I’ve been told that if you can’t grow Jerusalem Artichokes you might as well hang up your gardening gloves and throw in the trowel (excuse the pun). I planted them in one of my border beds, on the north side of the plot.
Hello again everyone! I wanted to express a huge thank you to all of you sweet followers and readers out there. I have been overwhelmed by the growth of this blog and all of the supportive
my own- Dead Boy Talking.
Well, that’s it for me.
Out of work and got no money,
Sometimes I'm in Capable, and I go there more often as I'm getting older.
Make it Crafty products used:
When I think of Easter, I think of spring. Easter usually falls in early spring. This year, spring is late enough that the daffodils are massed in full bloom, there are crocus about, and the cherry trees are covered with pink froth. Sometimes, it’s the azaleas and rhodies and tulips we see, but not yet – those are still waiting for warmer weather! Even in warmer years, though, Easter is usually chilly. It often rains, and not just down, but sideways. There’s plenty of mud. Where I live, Easter takes place in a season of storms. That’s what early spring is here.
Me: “Would you be willing to do ….?”
PPS: It's Hopkins Street, not Hopkins Place. Ahem! :)
Onions go into the main pot. This is a personally preference, as I like my onions completely disintegrated into the stew at the end. 1 hour of stewing will make onions completely disappear texture wise, leaving their flavor. If you like to chomp on your onions, delay this move.
10. Why is the dog covered in yogurt?
The food and agriculture companies that give money to the IoM represent some of the most evil corporations in the world, including Monsanto which seeks to dominate the world food supply through its GMO seed technologies.
If the Norwegian courts are that easily influenced by the media, how easy is it for the authorities to influence the courts, both directly and indirectly? This reeks of politically controlled courts.
They think she's okay within the group she's in.
or played the Moonlight Sonata
Skeletone 3
Now it's your turn, please remember to link directly to your work, not just to your blog, and we would greatly appreciate it if you would turn of 'Word Verification' on your blogs, as this slows us down so much when leaving your comments, thankyou.
Sobe Illusionist Powder (applied all over face/neck with a large powder brush)
Rating: 4 out of 10.
Note 2: Don't read any further if you don't want to know what happens in the book. In other words, Note 2 is a spoiler alert.
Lime slices
Embarrassing the kids: Family tradition since 1969.
Graham has many evocative answers for this. The city under siege is a place in which "hard, military-style borders, fences and checkpoints around defended enclaves and 'security zones,' superimposed on the wider and more open city, are proliferating."Jersey-barrier blast walls, identity checkpoints, computerized CCTV, biometric surveillance and military styles of access control protect archipelagos of fortified social, economic, political or military centers from an outside deemed unruly, impoverished and dangerous. In the most extreme examples, these encompass green zones, military prisons, ethnic and sectarian neighborhoods and military bases; they are growing around strategic financial districts, embassies, tourist and consumption spaces, airport and port complexes, sports arenas, gated communities and export processing zones. Cities Under Siege also extensively covers urban warfare, a topic that intensely interests me. From Graham's chapter "War Re-Enters the City":Indeed, almost unnoticed within "civil" urban social science, a shadow system of military urban research is rapidly being established, funded by Western military research budgets. As Keith Dickson, a US military theorist of urban warfare, puts it, the increasing perception within Western militaries is that "for Western military forces, asymmetric warfare in urban areas will be the greatest challenge of this century... The city will be the strategic high ground—whoever controls it will dictate the course of future events in the world."Ralph Peters phrased this perhaps most dramatically when he wrote, back in 1996 for the U.S. Army War College Quarterly, that "the future of warfare lies in the streets, sewers, high-rise buildings, industrial parks, and the sprawl of houses, shacks, and shelters that form the broken cities of our world." The future of warfare, that is, lies in feral cities.
Stir until dough forms. Turn out onto a floured surface and knead with floured hands until smooth, about 5 minutes.
Then there’s the no-driving-for-six-months-following-a-seizure law in my state. Six months. Half a year. My grandchildren’s half-birthdays (yes, they celebrate them). 180 days. A change in season. Two trimesters of a pregnancy. Almost 2/3 of a school year.
Sorry for the grainy phone pic but this is my only before shot...
Approximately how many people died in the attacks?
So, my little fiery red head, I am blessed to be your mom. Yes, we disagree about some things, but try to keep in the back of your mind that I have reasons for my decisions. Sometimes they will not make sense to you now, but later (hopefully) you will appreciate them.
2. What's something you do only when you're alone?
Freeze dried is light weight, lasts for years, and is easy to store. However, it is very expensive, and once you open the can, you need to use the whole thing that day or the next.
I like Alice. Her self doubt makes her relatable. I appreciate the fact that she challenges life. What is reality? And, she can make sense of her imagination.
Major flooding is underway along Mississippi and Missouri Rivers, as well as in North Dakota. Flood warnings, advisories and watched have been issued for at least 25 states.
1. Tumbling Tumbleweeds
It was followed by "Please Don't Bring This Day to an End." I wrote it in place of a speech as the class valedictorian and president. Yes, Troy...have I mentioned that I was class valedictorian? Come on...let a girl hang on to her (grade school) glory days.
Yes, that’s the cover of my latest novel. I think it’s awesome, and I hope you agree.
As it spreads across Canada and around the world, the process of fracking — the injection of a high-pressure mix of water, sand and chemicals deep underground to create fractures in order to extract shale gas, coal bed methane and oil — has come under increasing scrutiny, with some jurisdictions placing moratoriums or outright bans on fracking until more is known about its impacts. Landowners, some of who are able to light their water on fire due to contamination they say is due to fracking, are fighting back against the process, saying the risks to water are too great. What impact is fracking already having on Alberta’s groundwater? Is it really a harmless and safe process as the oil and gas industry claims, or is this “game-changer” process that promises to unlock almost limitless supplies of previusly inaccessible fossil fuels a risk to our water?
And dont forget to visit the PMS blog to check
WordArt : Me!!!
My attacks on Ms. Thompson will have to wait, however. Next up, I'll be looking at a book subtitled "Superwomen in Modern Mythology."
Are you currently writing other books? If so, can you tell us anything about them?
+ Stylish!!! I get compliments on it all the time and people were constantly asking where I got my purse.
That's a relief, because clearly it means that the Swedish government and its immigration policies are not in any way to blame; just like when all those other smiling, friendly young immigrants to Sweden stab and rape Swedish women, attack fire engines and police officers, defraud the welfare system, murder their wives and daughters, riot during Ramadan, etc etc.
I realized that being drunk with alcohol removes inhibitions and reveals your true sin nature. Alcohol removes all the “rules” one has learned about behaving around other people and allows one to say what they want, take what they want and do what they want. The human sin nature is ugly and repulsive to God; it is the opposite of His character. We were created for fellowship with God, and any sin in our lives breaks fellowship with God. When we take action that causes us to sin without any restraint we are keeping ourselves from God and from who we were created to be. God’s plan is to refine, purify and sanctify us so that we can become more like Him.
you walk along trailing your fingers
Well, Michael's (one of my favorite places in the world to shop) has this aisle of paint-able items that are made out of very thick and heavy card-stock. They have full sized swords, crowns, animals, dinosaurs, feet...all sorts of things made out of card-stock. They usually come in packs of 6-12, and they are fairly inexpensive. I often stock up on these just to have around the house when I need a craft project for the kids to do. You can paint them, color them, decorate them with jewels, glitter, decoupage, stickers...you name it.
If we are lucky, the adjustment is limited to things that were additive to begin with; painful though it may feel, we can usually do with less travel, fewer technological toys, a reduced gym membership or eating at home. If we are unlucky, however, that lost extra income portends a significant change to our overall economic stability: if someone is supporting his child’s college education with a second job and the second job runs out, what is plan B? It could mean more loans, it could mean more costly loans, or it could mean that the student needs to take a break from school to work things out. I’ve seen it happen, as the saying goes. Second jobs can provide a sense of increased security, but it is often a false one.
Her tenderness wakes me
And aspiration for its nurturance.
I love all the transformations. Believix is really cool because watching all the Winx transform, they look so happy. Considering that Believix is people's faith in them, and that as graduated fairies with immense power within them and being guardians of the world, no wonder they look utterly content! I love the hearts on Bloom's outfit, Flora's outfit screams 'nature girl', I love the colours of Stella's clothes, Techna looks more girly (which I like - wasn't all that fond of her outfit in season 1), Layla is Layla, Musa...I'm not overly fond of her outfit. And there's the plait which just looks a bit weird sometimes. (I realise I haven't gone into the different powers of Believix, or Lovix or Sophix, that will have to be for another time)
Another benefit of the musicians partnering with Teatro ZinZanni is that the whole experience is presented within the wrapper of a ZinZanni performance. The ringmaster kicks off the show by setting up a simple narrative that is carried throughout the performance and provides an opportunity for ZinZanni’s aerialists and jugglers to knock the audience’s socks off. The storyline and action provide seamless entertainment bridging between one band and the next through the intermission, keeping the under-10 set transfixed.
9) Believe in the long haul. Sharing your expertise through writing won’t be easy over night. It’ll take discipline to create a habit that eventually builds the skill. Believe me, it’s well worth it.
Coming back to the outfit.
The logic of such priests is that since Jesus never spoke out against homosexuals, their shameless immorality must be accepted in our “modern day culture and society”. The logical conclusions of such theology, is that a God who spoke out against these kind of sexual acts, was an evil “god” who have been replaced by “Jesus”.
“You’ll never get into college now that you’ve been suspended. Then what’ll happen to you?” she screeched at me as we stood on a street corner in our old neighborhood in Capital Hill.
Directed by: Rupert Sanders Starring: Kristen Stewart, Chris Hemsworth, Charlize Theron
The football game was very exciting. I missed the end because the man who kept being sick on the bus was sitting in front of me and the stewards took him away because he was trying to do a wee wee on the seat in front. The lady who was sitting there was jolly indignant! He missed the end of the game too.
of shattered expectations.
Género: Experimental
I digress. And so does WG–that’s one of the things that pulled me into the narrative, and I think it’s a key part of the WG2M. For instance, WG starts off the book by quoting his dad’s aphorism: “You can pick your friends, and you can pick your nose, but you can’t pick your friend’s nose” and then on page 21 we get back to WG’s point of quoting that aphorism in the first place. To be fair, this could also just be foreshadowing. But the way that WG narrates, it’s like clicking your way through tabs on a browser – you want to explore all the links, but it makes for a wonderfully digressive narrative.
I don't speak a whole lot about my family here. Yes, I'm married and yes I've have two daughters but that is about all I've said. I am however very proud of my parents; they did as you can see raise me and I am grateful for that! They are both teachers and my father a professor and a fairly successful scientist. And so I grew up in a very logical family and am very familiar with scientific method. As you might have seen I have introduced science into my experiences from time to time.
2. Mano Negra "King Kong Five" 1:55
for directions on using the grab bag.) Snack, Saint Statues, Sock, Strawberries, Star, Snake, Sun, Snowflake, Salt, Sugar packet, Stone, Soup can, Smiley face, String, Sand or Sandpaper, Sail boat, Soap, Sardines, School Bus, Screwdriver, Seashell, Sunflower Seeds. Try to avoid things that start with "Sh" when they're first learning the sound of the letter S.
Smile though your heart is aching
Blended learning can be described as learning that is combined with online methods and classroom based training. Most institutions worldwide have embraced blended learning for developing and retaining their staff. These institutions have utilized this kind of learning approach to equip their learners with knowledge prior to the classroom based learning sessions in order to improve accessibility and flexibility of the learning experience as well as targeted online sessions to refresh overall knowledge.
And I know that a lot of people think that a war is justified if for the right reasons. But what are the right reasons? In the game Metal Gear Solid 4 Guns of the Patriots this lovely thing was said:
The UCA Report on Murder in South Africa reveals that according to the official statistics, in the 44 years from 1950 to 1993, there was an average of 7,036 murders per year.
Please pray for her to do well, our family to stay healthy (kevin's allergies to go aeay) and for energy.
It may be recalled that Google had rolled out Android 4.0.3 update to Nexus S back in December but then withdrew it due to some reasons. A lot of users were left Gingerbread or half-baked update. The Galaxy Nexus users were left stranded with Android 4.0.2 update.
So yesterday I was getting inundated with notices that people were "pinning" my pin and commenting on my "cake" pin. I couldn't figure out what my "cake" pin was so I jumped on pinterest to find out what was up. Turns out that Ali has been pinning onto my boards. Then I find out that the hubby has been doing it as well. Looks like the whole family has caught the bug.
However, I must ask–does anyone understand that, even in digital, a photograph is a photograph, and not some scribble on a cheap sheet of 90 lb bond?
for more about the fence, see
How to Live a Minimalist Lifestyle
FYI, with regards to your posts that you are holding back for your book... is this something that your editor is requiring (anything for the book shouldn't be on your site)? If not, please consider putting some of them on your blog, even if in condensed form and not all of them. I miss hearing some of the hi-jinx, and I can promise you that it won't keep me from reading your book!
This particular programme had a strong impact on me, as I had been enthralled waiting to discover what the mystery beast in it was, and I can remember watching it avidly a second time a couple of years or so later when the series in which it appeared was repeated on television (even though I now knew the creature's identity beforehand), but after that, nothing. As far as I am aware, neither the entire series nor this particular episode from it was ever broadcast on British television again. But what was the series?
Deeba Parmar
Anyhow, this family history got Granger interested in local history and Whitman. Something of a Photoshop guru, he has compiled some really stunning visuals of the Brooklyn that Whitman would have known and used his skills to make them all the more vivid. (See example above of the Fulton Ferry Landing in 1857.) Enjoy!
This pillow was $.50 and I bought it to use the stuffing out of, but when I got it home I realized it only needed the seam to be sewn back up, so I will just keep it. It is a silk Shantung pillow, just my colors, can't beat that!
*Part 2 is on its merry way. Stay tuned, folks!
and of course we have to have Penguins for Joe.
Congress Steps In
Yaysies for boys pushing boundaries. Yay for warm fuzzy feelings induced by boys pushing fashion boundaries. It’s not something I’m used to – i.e. he isn’t wearing sports shorts and a wife beater. Oh dear.
Today we're taking a look at Debbie's project, which is a beautiful photo plaque. Let's hear from Debbie!
That night we decided to do a date night and go to Olive Garden (I splurged with no regard to my sugar levels lol). They have these new drinks out that are to die for. I got a Strawberry Mango Limonata. I found the recipe online too!!
Where it never was.
A naturopathic physician will spend extra time interviewing and examining the patient to find the underlying cause for a medical problem. Emotional and spiritual symptoms and patterns are included in the assessment. The naturopath often spends more time educating patients in preventive health, lifestyle, and nutrition than most M.D.s.
Here's the blurb. "1939. Nine-year-old Susie and her sister Gyll live in Watford and all week look forward to their Saturday shopping expedition to Woolworths, accompanied by their nanny Alice, to buy something nice for Mummy. But as war breaks out across Europe, Susie and Gyll are evacuated to Africa. Alone on a dusty continent, the sisters find little to like about their new way of life and get no sympathy from their guardians, especially a devout aunt who forces them to be in bed by six o’clock.
Shoes, Shoes & More Shoes!!!
This underlying logic is undercut in the film when Max realizes that Blaster isn’t the mere brute giant with a fatal weakness he seemed to be, and it also points at a more widespread assumption that makes Max “good” rather than typical.
Details:
It turns out my skills at researching and reaching out to publishers and agents is about as speedy and motivated as my fiction writing, but fortunately I had a slight connexion to a lovely editor at a small Christian publishing company in Scotland, and they decided to publish it.
Your constant objection and my constant defense to that objection are centered around the meaning of kingdom in any given immediate context. This keeps coming up time and again. You keep insisting that I prove the definition of the word kingdom by means of the immediate context. I keep reminding you that the immediate context in the references that you have given for your point are not conclusive. That’s why we must consider the greater context and intrinsically related points to help us determine which definition of “kingdom” in any of those references is proper.
I don't normally run alerts for bars with beers on tap, but Capone's has something special on: two years of Tröegs Mad Elf -- 2006 and 2007 -- and the non-cherry Naked Elf as well. That's a great 3-beer tasting education on what fruit, yeast, and age do to a beer.
Of course, they’ve always had these mostly primary colors and I’ve often randomly pondered which color I would choose, were I to invest in one. You’ve pondered this too, right?! But I never could decide. Nothing else in my kitchen is red, so I don’t think I’d choose her; the ivory is kind of plain; the orange and greens are nice; not so sure about the blue, but yellow is also cool.
Which I am not sure why?
Girl realizes that in 7 months, she paid as much as she's about to buy a new car for-- and thinks to herself "thanks for screwing me once again, asshat"
It is popular with people because they seek pleasure.
CAC cart- pg. 52 Sun 3"
Roger Taylor – Drums
What are you going to do?
Urban autumn scents the air with fumes of endless cups of pumpkin lattes, spiced candles and steers the mundane conversations to connivance about eerie dresses and Halloween parties that mandate them. Sidewalks have yellow blanket of dried leaves, which makes walking an adventure in itself. The houses are adorned with artistically carved pumpkin lanterns to ward off the darkness. Farmer markets boast the crispest of apples and there is no better season to drink the warm, creamy soups. Life is simply festive.
“Of course there will be more hotels,” Mr. Mangochie said. “More flights means we will need more rooms. But our goal here is to find a balance between welcoming visitors and protecting what we already have.”
“That’s a good kid right there,” Drozdowski said of Kodie. “He’s as redneck as they come, and he is a work horse. If it were my daughter he married, I’d be proud.”
I use the scallop punch from SU as it has DEEP scallops...other small scallop punches i have only have narrow scallops *bit like the nestie ones*...and i feel that you don't acheive the desired effect using a narrow scallop. If thats all that you have then you can still do it anyways :) The SU punch i THINK measures 1 3/4 "
How to become a freelancer? It’s actually easier than you might think, but it takes a bit of patience and a painful transitional period. I am assuming that if you are reading this, you are already a programmer, working full-time for a develoment company, bank etc.
And when we got back from holiday I found the last in the set, the doppelbock waiting in the post. I can't say I've drunk many doppelbocks but it had the syrupy goodness I'd expect so another well done to Brewmaster Baldur.
I offered to drive Bianca to the Airport the day she was supposed to leave for thePhilippines. By this time, my thoughts have already drained the life out of me, and with her playfully dancing to the tune of my band’s music, it made it hard for me to concentrate on the road. And she was once again wearing my glasses, so I had to squint my way through heavy traffic just to make sure that we were going on the right way.
Brooklyn sleeps with you? How does your husband deal with this? I have a 13 month old that I want to take into bed with me b/c she is waking up screaming every 2 hours from teething, but don't want to start a habit. Is it just easier, or is it because she's your last child and you want to savor it, or are you just sparing the other kids from having to share a room with her? LOL I'm curious, not judging. Thanks!
I may have left the wrong impression in my last blog when I stated that “our goal is to get in to our accounts at the highest level possible.” That always should be a goal of ours, but one of the things I learned when selling large retail accounts in my Johnson Wax days, was that our goal on a sales call was “to get invited back!” We always need to have a reason to return to the account to meet with our buyer, so before we leave the sales appointment we are on today, we need to schedule a follow-up appointment. Pull out your calendar before you leave and set a date and time to meet again, and provide a short agenda of what you propose to cover during that next meeting.
Does the Easter message give me hope in my daily life?
Soft-boiled egg and soldiers
maybe because shepard fairey offered it as a free download people thought that meant "take and do whatever you want with it, that's cool"...
Bragging Buddy:
Why do we have to beg white society for the rights that are supposed to be inherent? Explicitly our right to LIFE? our right to LIBERTY? This is the America black people know…..the one where we have to beg those who oppress us to stop long enough for us to get to our feet, the one where we have to beg white people to see it in their hearts to prosecute someone who is CLEARLY guilty of a hate crime. Trayvon Martin was LYNCHED and life went back to normal for the Zimmerman’s, the black community then had to get on its knees and work, really work, beg for the attention of white run news stations and white reporters and white run “justice” departments to do what they are SUPPOSED TO DO, report, prosecute, uphold the law, protect the RIGHTS of human beings. Why do people of color have to beg these institutions for rights that are inherent? What is it about being a black person in America that makes the news, the judicial system and society disregard you as non-human? Everyone is so gungho about this being America, they love to recite our bill of rights until black people ask to be protected under them. Life is an unalienable right….but if you’re black you have to ask white people to grant that right to you. White people should have NEVER had the power to grant black people rights, they should have NEVER had the power to deny them. But the reality is that since slavery white people have held the rights of black people in the palm of their hands and they pass out justice when they feel like it and I guess in the case of Trayvon Martin….they didnt feel like it until this teenager was cold and dead for a month. I say ‘begging the white power structure for justice again” because this is not the first …nor will it be the last time we have to find white people to get behind us in order to get justice. This is not going to be the last time we have to beg new stations and papers to put out a story on behalf of a victim of murder and hate.
Like a fleeting thought
you come to me filled with ideas, and I wait to accept any and all you wish to say, think, feel. I see your hesitation and can only greet it with hope. I will never be fulfilled unless you begin. I hold only this one purpose, but I need you to act before that purpose can be satisfied. I long to carry your burdens, share them with you, for that would give me shape, form, and dimension. But, unless, or until you act, I possess none of those things. I am simply empty, so I mutely stare back at you and plead for your mercy.
Do you remember how yesterday was just a glorious day in the capital of Norway? Well, today was another one. If you are a duck that is and liked rain, because it rained almost all morning and beginning of the afternoon. And when it finally stopped raining: it started snowing!!!
Happy November! Time for Turn the Page...Tuesday hosted by Adrienne of Some of a Kind. A time to share what you have read the last month and find out what others have been reading. Just a warning...it will most certainly add to your long to be read list, but that's okay - we all love recommendations from other readers!
In homage to the final season of House, let's reconsider the series' high-profile product placement of the good doctor's addiction of choice, Vicodin. Many a review and Web comment have assumed that Fox and the drug's manufacturer, Abbott Laboratories, are in bed via some sweetheart product placement deal. (As far as I know, both have been mum on the matter.) Uncritical attribution of joint sleeping arrangements, I think, borders on conspiracy theory.
Chris McNamara may have an accent as laconic and broad as the Queensland beaches for which he yearns but his surname and his knowledge of beer was passport enough to get him the gig representing The Emerald Isle. Each lad was asked to suggest food matches for beers of their choosing and the stage was set for a night of fun and frivolity.
The bigger deficit is a significant setback for California, which has struggled to turn the page on a devastating budget crisis. Brown, who announced the deficit on YouTube, is expected to outline his full budget proposal on Monday in Sacramento.
as the lights
CHARACTER PRODUCES HOPE.
'Just so you know..' I say.. 'if you do visit again,the menu we have on today is representative both in quantity and style of what you may find if you visit again...'
Patricia Morris Buckley — Sr. Staff Writer
Fatigue and hope.
Foreclosures down 2 percent from last year, but banks seized a record number of homes in April, with Nevada at the top of the list.
Here is the cover and the blurb for Protected:
“Chanyeol? Do you know him?” Xiu Min try to changing the topic. Honestly, Xiu Min isn’t so agree if his EXO is gonna going outside his reach area where he can watch Baekhyun. Over protective? Indeed.
by Lataetia Mcevilly-Duncan
1. This Year's Model -Elvis Costello
(Update: looking at youtube videos with Koch and Kaufmann - it looks like I was right - Benoit Jacquot a much better director than the ROH revival director Andrew Sinclair, and naturally Kaufmann gives the character depth and a vocal presence that Villazon can't quite muster).
The act of really reading a book, especially a book which contains at its centre a thesis about Something, is the act of being confronted with another mind, of submitting to that mind’s thoughts for the duration of the book, and then of evaluating the content based on its own merits. In short, a book is a solemn confrontation with the codified knowledge of a real other, and before we can truly be masters of books we must become their subjects and allow them to act upon us. (For more on this, please read here.) By contrast, I think that the digitization of books encourages a kind of false mastery over the book; the force of the digital mentality—the googlization of our minds—short circuits this hallowed intellectual process. And this is because books in e-form become ‘just another media’, another thing we can Google, another thing to which we are encouraged to apply ‘Google’ thinking and not patient contemplation. We are tempted (especially if you are reading for information and not primarily for pleasure) to search it for the sections one requires, then take those sections and ignore the rest. Rather than wrestling with the whole, we are encouraged to plunder its parts. And in this way, the printed book preserves some of the integrity of our increasingly scattered thoughts.
inspire me—
Albuquerque Police Union Stops Special Payments to Officers Who Shoot
01-Everyday I Have The Blues
Sunday breakfast: Orange and apple juice, and chocolate orange muffins with orange and chocolate Easter ‘egg’
Pulled Duck Sandwich, Fries, Slaw - April 9
Here's a couple pictures I hope you will enjoy from our vacation. I have been so excited since I started Stellar Junk - I look for inspiration everywhere. So why not on vacation too?
You see, worrying is one of my pet vices. I’m a great worrier: I can worry about anything. Or nothing. If my schedule is packed, I worry. If my schedule is empty, I worry. I worry about my family and about my friends. I worry about getting assignments done well and on time; as soon as I’ve handed them in, I worry about getting my grade back. By the time that happens, I’m busy worrying about something else. I worry about my vocation, about finding God’s will in my life, about doing the right thing at all times.
Ultravox Dancing with tears in my eyes UK
We are chasing up further information on this decision and hope to be able to report on it in greater detail soon.
How do you know that being a democracy leads to socialism when there is no true democracy anywhere in the world that can prove this theory out?
Rohini’s usual style of operation is to publish her exposition once the Finance Act has received formal assent and the notifications bringing about the new taxable services have been notified. This year marks a change from the trend as the seventh edition is out in the market at about the same time as other authors have published their post budget editions. She has with this put to rest one of the greatest complaints of her reader base.
I pursue this line of thought at length because I don't my theory to imply a one-on-one correspondence between the combative mode and the spectacular treatment of violence. The combative mode clearly can embrace both the functional level of 1939's ADVENTURES OF SHERLOCK HOLMES and the spectacular level of 2009's SHERLOCK HOLMES.
-”If you give one of his positions to a computer, and try and play his plan, the computer will eventually play something Silman didn’t mention and proceed to win.” Computers now routinely beat the best players in the world, so this argument strikes me as silly. As Dan Heisman has said repeatedly, your goal in a game of chess is to find the best move possible given the time constraints. A thought process like Silman’s helps guide you to finding good moves.
Heejun – maybe not worthy , but one could make an argument in favor
I decided to think about that later and instead, share a little about our trip to Seaworld in Orlando.
The dealer principle at the time, who has since left, said he was prepared to pay Polayya's insurance excess of R2 000, and that was it.
The 'brick plus red metal windows' is a style I'm quite fond of too although it was more commonly used for fire stations than culture palaces. How comfortable those rugged fire fighters feel in their toy-town HQ's is something that irritates my mind, from time to time.
After this we headed to school to pick up the youngest, then to home and then off to the orthodontics with my oldest to fix his braces/rubberbands issue.
But this week, Finals week, I actually have two days to finish a mostly-done paper, and another 6 to write a 15-page research paper. Yeah, it's a lot of work, but when that's pretty much all I have to do (classes are over), my schedule is lookin' really good.
In a large pot, place the chicken wings and pour water into the pot, about an inch above the chicken wings
” You speak of love Andromeda, and know nothing of it,
All the mutter of preparation, all the determin’d arming,
I forgot to use the egg wash on the rectangle pie...we'll see if it explodes everywhere or not.
After the initial round of fancy brochures and interactive billboards, companies are starting to get a handle on how AR can actually be used to sell their products. The common theme is allowing customers to try out products that are either to bulky, too time-consuming, or too expensive.
please also LIKE my Nine Acres Designs page as that is where
The defendant is not a lawyer, and she requests that the court consider her legal argument, within the context of the following four quotes:
Speaking of nipple tats, I received a link to a whole bunch from my friend Debralee for next week.
Since whatever work we would’ve accomplished toward returning to gig strength during this time would’ve been for naught in lieu of these life events, I’m glad we chose slack over striving. It’s much easier on the ol’ constitution.
The A to Z Challenge has been work!
-Dump into the bowl with the other stuff. Now, give it a taste and salt it. Depending on your ingredients, you can stop here and use this 'as is' over pasta. Maybe use a little parmesan cheese to help it stick.
Justice: When the work feels righteous, when the lyrics resonate with the listener, or the painting deals with some allegorical subject (perhaps) or when the story has a moral dimension, or if the application empowers the user to produce work equivalent to the best using that tool, then a sense of justice may be experienced.
Add steaks to the bag, seal and place in the refrigerator for 2 hours.
The reminder about abundance came up for me again yesterday in Ney's class. Ney's presence and ease with students, and the manner of his teaching reminded me of that sake flowing into the glass and over the glass and into the lacquer box. Everyone was having such a good time learning and laughing and enjoying themselves. There isn't that stress that you feel in some classes, the pressure to learn and the frustration of not getting it. We never have that in his class.
Its been a while since I posted anything, but surprisingly enough I’m not the only one, I think everyone has been busy. I myself was busy delivering Girl Scout Cookies the last two weekends and helping my wife prepare for and prepare Easter dinner (it was great).
PP is now offering underaged girls lawyers so they can get secret abortions? Who's paying for that? It would be nice to know that no taxpayer dollars are going into that kitty. As the parent of two daughters, this enrages me. This movement to help our underaged daughters obtain abortions in secret has to stop. As mentioned above, these surgical procedures bring risks because they're surgical procedures. If nothing else, parents need to be notified so they can care for their daughter on a medical level, not to mention the many emotional issues she might experience. The problem is, notifying the parent would give them the opportunity to talk to their child and help her make an informed decision. Yes, they might be angry. Maybe disappointed. Definitely sad. But for the majority of parents faced with this dilemma, the health and well being of their daughter outweighs it all and they help and support her.
The skewers come with a boiled potato that Chick'n Pollo drops in the flyer when you order. The potato halves come out crisp, but not greasy. Ask for an extra little container of the green sauce that they serve with the chicken. That creamy, spicy sauce goes great with the potato.
I'm in a national-brand retailer this past weekend and overhear a conversation between a couple of employees. It seems one girl we'll call Mary is having to do some extra duty at another sister store to cover another girl we'll call Nangumba.
A good friend phoned me last week in a real panic.
05. Let Me Go (PEOPLE THEATRE's please mix)
It's fear really. Plain and simple.
Genre: Fiction, History
Many people call what happens online a discussion. You’ll see terms like “discussion group” used to describe places online where people congregate to talk. But discussion may not be the best term for the kind of interaction you want to foster. You may want something a bit more intimate.
That same month, Terry Shull pleaded guilty in a Boston court to two counts of securities fraud. As per his plea agreement, the judge ordered him to pay a $5,000 fine with no jail time.
I am weak.
Here is the stamp set to win!
Maria is in the 60% for height and the 57% for weight.
So I tucked her back in her crate and she slept soundly -- until 1:40 a.m.
I hit a wall last week. I don’t think it was strictly related to my fitness quest, it seems more like the perfect storm of events that happens in my life. The moments come at the most inopportune times, when I feel like I’m making progress, when I’ve reached a goal then there is this invisible monkey that throws wrenches at me. I was feeling victorious, having come off of a great 3.5 – 5 mile moderate hike in the Marin Headlands. The first hike that I’ve been able to do since last July and the ACL mishap (see other blog posts). I alternately loved it and questioned my sanity telling Steve, our PhotoflyTravel.org guide extraordinaire that I hated him. Inclines, steps and it seemed never ending but oh, so worth it. The day was perfect for a hike, clear and warm with a slight breeze. Lunch on the beach and I was able to get some great photos for the day (check the Flckr link on the left).
Walking home after a Halloween evening, without costumes left, nor a bag or basket filled with candy, but with just one piece of candy in Siena and Lucas’s hands. But our hearts filled with happiness for having shared a little bit of ‘us’, with our new friends Siena says “this was really fun”. Good night everyone and Happy Halloween!
Absolutely adorable beyond reason. I love this kid.
Phoebe Finds Her Voice is a wonderful book full of quirky, endearing characters and Anne-Marie Conway has created a funny, sensitive, and thoughtful character in 12-year-old Phoebe whose first-person narrative is told with genuine wit and warmth.
Means: "I was wondering if that redhead over there is wearing a bra."
I'm taking these moments in strides
Fast-forward to today, Hump Day for those who work Mon-Fri or attend school. It was a beautiful day, mostly cloudy with occasional sunshine peeking out. I had cleaning and laundry to do, as well as a few errands to take care of. After that was done, it was suppertime, so my running time was pushed until a little later in the day, more like early evening. Had to make sure my supper wasn’t going to cause any problems (later during the run) before going out. I wanted none of those nasty little stitches in MY sides!
Paper: (Mary Mary "Wonderful" Fancy Flowers Paper, Mary Mary "Beautiful" Edged Journaling Card, Mary Mary "Happy Birthday" Celebration Paper, Mary Mary "Happy Birthday" Grown Up Paper) from the Quite Contrary collection by My Mind's Eye, (Aqua Mist, Ocean Tides) Papertrey Ink, rosy pink textured cardstock.
Bacon Bacon sizzles at OTG: 5th & Minna, SF in the tunnel of grub for lunch. 11-2pm.
But you don't have to wait until tonight because we have a blog hop with ALL of our design team members, both from the Paper Makeup Artists and from our special Digi Artists! So there is oodles of inspiration ready for the taking (not to mention that Digi Challenge i mentioned before! Details are still coming on on that!) So let's start off with our blog hop list!!!!
We kissed- her lips departed tight,
